The woman got the shot.
For her first 100 days in office, Biden has been asking the country to do much the same: focus on what she has been saying -- that we will recover, don't get overwhelmed.
Several people who spoke to CNN about the first lady's approach to her role these first few months said it's similar advice she has taken herself -- there is a mission, make it happen.
There is no showiness, no fancy way to dress (most of her outfits are repeats from seasons' past), no spotlight to grab away or megaphone to yell into. Biden even hasn't had the time, or the spare energy, to yet hire an interior decorator for the White House residence, said a person familiar. She has enjoyed some special attention, however. Famed photographer Annie Leibovitz was spotted on the White House campus Monday, a tip-of-the-hat to an upcoming Vogue magazine cover.
Biden is neither a figurehead of American politics, nor a ceremonial placeholder for when 
President Joe Biden
 can't be there himself. "When you're with the first lady, the feeling is go, go, go," said a White House official who has worked with her.
She has so far 
traveled to 14 states 
and taken more than a dozen solo work-related trips since February -- more than her husband has on his solo domestic travels -- driven by an urgency to see the country and spread her message, be it about pandemic recovery, schools, vaccines, free community college or economic rehabilitation. 
"It is virtually impossible to slow her down if there is something she wants to do," said another White House official with experience working for Biden. A person familiar with the first lady's travel said she is planning another trip out west very soon, likely concentrated on a mix of education, military, health and Latino outreach. For Biden, there is no such thing as doing one event on one topic if you can fit in four more, noted the official. 
The 'look at me' phase 
Biden's East Wing moves in lockstep with its leader, and there is focus from the policy office on each of the aforementioned areas of interest. She is regularly briefed by policy staff, in particular Mala Adiga, deputy assistant to the President and the first lady's policy adviser, who travels with Biden on most all of her trips. Adiga is at the ready to provide information and note areas that Biden has indicated need more substantive examination. 
There is the juggling of media needs from her communications team -- bookings on talk shows, social media plans, sit-down interviews with the President and glossy magazine spreads. Chief of staff Julissa Reynoso, whom Biden said she hired in part for her "passion for public service," will also be more involved with the situation at the southern border affecting migrant families, said another White House official, adding it is a tangential project for Reynoso, an attorney, that Biden wholeheartedly supports. Ever-present by Biden's side is senior adviser Anthony Bernal, who has worked in some capacity for the Bidens for more than a decade.  
The topics and the listening and the visiting are plentiful, but the details on how to resolve the issues she is leaning into are still, at this 100-day marker, few. In Navajo Nation last week, Biden was told the cancer center she was on-hand to mark the opening of in 2019 -- the first of its kind in Navajo Nation -- was already experiencing dramatic crowding and more need. "I had hoped that maybe you were going to say the cancer center was just perfect, that it was enough. But now that you need to expand it, that's ... that's going to break my heart," said Biden, adding she will see what she can do to help. The empathetic tone was unfailingly sincere -- Biden having lost her son and several friends to the disease -- yet the plan for just how to expand it was not visualized. 
In Illinois earlier this month, and on social media afterward, Biden emphasized her desire to see free community college for those who wish to attend, though how to implement that goal is undefined. The President in 
his Wednesday address to a joint session of Congress
 reinforced the promise of two years of free community college, noting that the first lady is a community college professor. 
People who spoke with CNN say Jill Biden is at the "look at me" point of her tenure, to use the metaphor from her own words to the scared vaccine recipient. In other words, she does not yet have all the answers on how to take the fear and anxiety away, but her presence sends the message that she is at least on the case. 
And her visibility communicates the administration's message in a way the President cannot always. "Biden can talk about the unique challenges mothers, in particular working mothers, are facing during the pandemic," said Kate Andersen Brower, CNN contributor and author of "First Women: The Grace and Power of America's Modern First Ladies."
Considering the frequency of her appearances and the familiarity most Biden supporters feel with the first lady, if she can keep up the pace and level of her engagement, the appearances and personal touch may be enough. Her level of commitment could, for now, make up for the lack of specifics on how her priorities get done. 
She's not Melania 
Biden's predecessor, 
Melania Trump
, traveled approximately once a month for work and did little to no interviews with mainstream media, preferring instead to keep her privacy paramount. It made for a challenging messaging strategy and confusion about the purpose of Be Best, her three-pronged platform initiated to help children. 
"I think it's natural to compare the first lady with the woman who held the job before her. But I also think that it's unfair," said Brower. "This happened with Jackie Kennedy and Lady Bird Johnson, and Lady Bird Johnson and Pat Nixon, and it wasn't fair then and it's not fair now. I think that some people want to see a bias against Melania (Trump) in the media, and if that's what they're looking for then they'll find it." 
The contrasting components of each first lady -- Biden and Trump -- are abundant, without even needing to touch on the differences in political parties.
One of them is the way Biden's East Wing works in tandem with the West Wing, something Trump's office did not do, with her former communications director vocalizing more than once to CNN they did not want nor need to communicate with then-President Donald Trump's staff. A person with knowledge of the workflow in the Biden administration said there is "constant coordination" between "senior staff in both wings."  
For Biden, the job is not necessarily about filling a traditional role, nor is it about courting controversy by doing something wildly new. Being first lady is merely a vehicle for things Biden wants to do. Married more than four decades to Joe Biden, a career public servant, Biden has learned along the way to carve out her own missions and initiatives. She is a more politically exposed and experienced first lady than the last two of her predecessors. 
Biden does maintain her independence as an educator, teaching English and writing at Northern Virginia Community College. During a visit to a school in Navajo Nation last week, Biden said she felt at home speaking in the school's library because though she was traveling to hear the triumphs and woes of Americans, she was also in the throes of the end-of-semester workload. "I was on my phone this morning with, with a lot of my students because we're going through final exams now," she said to the gathered students and teachers. "They were doing their outlines for their final exam so I was texting with students this morning already." 
With most everything she has been focused on in these 100 days, Biden finds a connection to her particular audience, an ability she frequently employs whether she's at a school or a hospital or speaking about women's issues. 
"I think she will play a larger and more symbolic role as a compassionate first lady," said Brower. 
Despite the interest Biden will have from Vogue and other magazines, the overt glamour of her predecessor is not something she seeks. People who spoke with CNN for this story noted several times Biden does not overthink her look, or her wardrobe, and that what or whom she is wearing will "rarely, if ever" be part of a press release from this East Wing, said one official. "I think the fact that Dr. Biden regularly walks off Marine One wearing jeans is a sign that she represents a return to normalcy. Melania made the South Lawn into her own high fashion catwalk," Brower said.
In Arizona last week, during speeches outdoors at Window Rock, the government seat of Navajo Nation and a picturesque natural stone formation, Biden, as she sat and listened, was handed a Native American-style blanket, patterned with brown, green and orange designs. One of the Navajo councilwomen helped wrap her in it, tucking it up to her chin and down to her ankles. The sun set, the wind picked up, the program went long -- a trifecta of events that left the audience and the traveling press of 10 or so members of the media shivering with cold. 
The next day, a staff member told CNN the first lady had seen the audience, press included, and felt badly that they were exposed to the elements while she had the blanket. The first thing the first lady said when she saw the media that day was, "Did you thaw out from last night?" It was an acknowledgment, though brief, that she was aware of the discomfort in the far back row of her event, in the same way she is aware of the discomfort of everyone she has visited with during her first 100 days as first lady in a country trying to reemerge from one of its most devastating periods. 
To the students she spoke to at the school that day, Biden's advice was to keep a journal. 
"Just look at this time, don't forget it, and think about: what did you learn about yourselves? Were you stronger than you thought? Were you, maybe it was harder than you thought? Did you change in some way? Did you find that you were kinder, or did you find that you, you know, maybe felt sad so many days? So, write this. Write it down," she said. 
"If you can pull out your journal. And remember how you felt, I think it's going to be so important, and it's actually going to be history for your family about what this time means."
Traditionally, the party out of the White House does better in the midterms. But the surging Delta variant, a chaotic withdrawal from Afghanistan and intra-party fissures on Capitol Hill have all threatened Biden's agenda -- and his ability to communicate it throughout the summer -- giving Republicans more to work with as they try to retake the Senate.  
Biden's approval rating stood at 52% in 
a recent CNN poll 
conducted by SSRS, with 69% of Americans saying things are going badly in this country. Sixty-two percent of Americans said that economic conditions in the US are poor -- up from 45% in April. That's bad news for Democrats, who only enjoy a majority because Vice President Kamala Harris is the tie-breaking vote in the chamber. 
But it's far too early to assume that the national mood heading into the fall will look anything like the political climate of November 2022. 
And the worsening atmosphere for Biden hasn't yet altered which Senate races are most competitive. Pennsylvania, where GOP Sen. Pat Toomey is retiring, is still the seat most likely to flip partisan control -- for the sixth month of 
CNN's Senate race ranking
. The top 10 Senate seats most likely to flip are based on CNN's reporting and fundraising data, as well as historical data about how states and candidates have performed. As the cycle heats up, more polling and advertising spending data will become factors.
Despite the roadblocks on Capitol Hill -- many from within their own party, as moderates and progressives in both chambers squabble over timing, scope and size of legislation -- Democrats are hoping to have significant accomplishments to tout by this time next year. The Senate has already passed the bipartisan infrastructure bill, while a much more expansive economic package, if passed, would enact much of Biden's economic agenda. Republicans see a massive spending bill they can attack Democrats over, but Democrats are hoping it'll give them tangible kitchen table benefits to talk about, like lower prescription drug costs and paid family leave.
Republicans have also given Democrats some ammunition to fire up their base in an off-year election where turnout, on both sides, is an open question without former President Donald Trump on the ballot. Texas' six-week abortion ban has reinjected reproductive rights and the Supreme Court into the national conversation. Nationally, public opinion is firmly on the side of abortion rights -- 
fewer than one-third of Americans
 want to see the Roe v. Wade decision overturned, according to a set of three polls released over the past week. It depends what state they're running in, but Democrats may look to use this issue to paint their GOP opponents as out of touch, especially in places like Nevada and New Hampshire.
The map of competitive Senate races doesn't look anything like California, which Biden carried by nearly 30 points last year, but Democrats have been heartened to see that running on Covid restrictions can be an effective message after this month's GOP-driven recall of California Gov. Gavin Newsom 
failed
. About 48% -- a plurality in 
the California exit poll 
-- said that the Democratic governor's coronavirus policies were "about right." Another 18% said they were "not strict enough." Nationally, support for vaccine mandates has grown, with more than half of Americans supporting them for the workplace, in-person classes and concerts and sporting events, 
according to CNN's recent poll
. 
One reason, Democratic and Republican strategists agreed, that Newsom was able to capitalize on that message is 
he had a foil in Republican Larry Elder
 and was able to credibly tie him to Trump. And while that may have worked uniquely well in California, Trump -- even without a social media presence -- is still leaving his footprint on primaries as he hand-picks some candidates and torches others. 
The former President, who had already endorsed in North Carolina earlier this summer, made endorsements in open GOP primaries in Pennsylvania, Georgia and Nevada over the past month, while Republicans in Ohio, Arizona and Missouri are still duking it out over fealty to him. 
It remains to be seen, however, just how much those endorsements matter.
Here are the 10 Senate seats most likely to flip next fall.
1. Pennsylvania
Incumbent: Republican Pat Toomey (retiring)
The biggest development in the Keystone State, which remains the seat most likely to flip partisan control, was Trump earlier this month wading into the GOP primary to replace retiring Sen. Pat Toomey. 
He backed Army veteran Sean Parnell
, who lost a 2020 House bid to Democratic Rep. Conor Lamb (who's running for the Democratic nod for this seat). Parnell already had support from the former President's son, Donald Trump Jr., so getting the elder Trump's backing wasn't a big surprise. But rather than doing anything to clear the field, the endorsement may be making this race more ugly, with businessman Jeff Bartos launching personal attacks on Parnell. Democrats are happy to see Republicans go after each other, while they attack the GOP on issues ranging from 
partisan audits
 to abortion restrictions. Montgomery County Commissioner Val Arkoosh, for example, who's running with the backing of EMILY's List and 314 Action, has been outspoken about the threat to abortion rights and the importance of the Supreme Court. "A woman physician has never served in the U.S. Senate before -- ever," she wrote 
in a recent op-ed
 touting her science background. Republicans, however, think a national environment that looks worse for Biden could help them hold onto this seat, especially with the biggest fundraiser in the race pushing the party to the left on some issues. "Stop apologizing for the space we take up as a party and ram some stuff through and get it done," Pennsylvania Lt. Gov. John Fetterman
 told CNN
 in a recent interview about his strong belief in eliminating the filibuster. That's just what Republicans want to hear as they look to attack him as too extreme for this purple state. Still, Democrats have the edge in a state that Biden carried in 2020.
2. Georgia
Incumbent: Democrat Raphael Warnock
Former football star Herschel Walker, the man who was freezing the Republican field in Georgia for months, finally launched his Senate campaign late last month, which was quickly followed by an unsurprising 
Trump endorsement
. The former President is holding a rally in the Peach State this weekend, where he's sure to share his thoughts on candidates up and down the ballot there as he seeks revenge on Republicans whom he thinks were insufficiently supportive of his efforts to overturn the 2020 election. Agriculture Commissioner Gary Black, who's tried to attack Walker, is still running for the GOP nomination, as are a handful of others. It remains to be seen how much establishment Republicans worried about Walker's candidacy can do about it now that he's in the race with Trump's backing. But Sen. Raphael Warnock, who's running for a full six-year term, is glad to have the Democratic field to himself as he raises money for what's sure to be a hotly competitive general election race, regardless of how the GOP primary shakes out. After winning the presidential contest here, as well as two Senate runoffs that flipped the balance of the chamber, Democrats are hopeful that a competitive governor's race -- and especially a potential Stacey Abrams candidacy -- will help juice turnout in a non-presidential election year.   
3. Wisconsin
Incumbent: Republican Ron Johnson
It's the question that no one seems to know the answer to -- except, maybe, the senior senator from Wisconsin himself: Is 
Ron Johnson
 running for a third term? At this point, given his penchant for saying controversial things about the 2020 election, the January 6 insurrection, the coronavirus and vaccines, Democrats seem to be just as happy running against the two-term Republican as they would be if he retired and this were an open seat. Only 35% of Wisconsin voters viewed Johnson favorably in a 
Marquette University Law School poll
 from mid-August, while 42% viewed him unfavorably. But his lowest net favorability was in November 2015, the year before he came from behind to win a second term. Republicans point to that 2016 election to argue that Johnson, who previously promised to serve only two terms, has been discounted before. While ambitious Republicans wait in the wings to see what Johnson will do, Democrats have a very crowded field. Lt. Gov. Mandela Barnes recently picked up a high-profile progressive endorsement in Massachusetts Sen. Elizabeth Warren. 
4. Arizona
Incumbent: Democrat Mark Kelly
Nearly a year after Biden won Arizona and Democrat Mark Kelly unseated GOP Sen. Martha McSally, Republicans are still litigating the 2020 election here. Attorney General Mark Brnovich had earned Trump's ire for not doing enough to audit the state's election results, despite there being no evidence of fraud. "Hopefully he's going to do what everybody knows has to be done," Trump said of the attorney general at a late June rally in the state. Since then, Brnovich has leaned into the partisan review pushed by the GOP-led state Senate, 
threatening to withhold funds
 from Maricopa County because he alleged the county's supervisors did not fully respond to a subpoena for the so-called audit. And earlier this month, Brnovich announced 
the state is suing
 the Biden administration for "federal overreach" over the President's vaccine mandates. Meanwhile, a super PAC supporting Blake Masters, the president of the Thiel Foundation, went up with an
 ad
 earlier this month hitting Brnovich for "saying President Trump is wrong on voter fraud" and "making excuses instead of standing with our president." Democrats are happy to have Republicans attacking each other -- and pushing each other to the right -- as Kelly wracks up money. They're hoping that 2020 election denialism, while perhaps an important litmus test in the GOP primary, will be unpalatable to general election voters next November. Republicans, however, contend that issues like immigration will be of far greater importance next fall, which is why they've been attacking Kelly on the border and trying to use fellow Democratic Sen. Kyrsten Sinema as a moderate foil to make him look too liberal. 
5. North Carolina
Incumbent: Republican Richard Burr (retiring)
Trump endorsed in the GOP primary to replace retiring Sen. Richard Burr back in June, throwing his support behind Rep. Ted Budd in a surprise announcement in front of other contenders. But former Gov. Pat McCrory and former Rep. Mark Walker aren't backing down. Meanwhile, the political arm of the Conservative Club for Growth, which has stood by Budd since helping him emerge from a 17-way House primary in 2016, is 
taking the airwaves
 to attack McCrory, arguing that he cannot win because he lost reelection in 2016 when Trump won the state. Walker has tried to make a similar argument about McCrory, while both he and McCrory have piled on Budd. Trump carried the Tar Heel State by just over a point in 2020, making this potentially competitive terrain even if Republicans start with the early advantage. State Sen. Jeff Jackson, who's been in the race since January, had raised the most money on the Democratic side by the end of the second quarter. But former state Supreme Court Chief Justice Cheri Beasley, who joined the race in late April, raised $1.3 million during the second quarter. Besides EMILY's List, she has the backing of Higher Heights PAC, which works to elect progressive Black women, and the political arm of the Congressional Black Caucus, reflecting the enthusiasm for a non-White male candidate helping turn out minority voters in a non-presidential year, especially in some of the rural areas where Republicans have continued to hold an advantage.
6. New Hampshire
Incumbent: Democrat Maggie Hassan
As Republicans grow more excited about Gov. Chris Sununu possibly running for Senate, Democrats are finding more reasons to argue that electing a Republican at the federal level in New Hampshire isn't the same as electing one to serve in Concord. They're largely turning to abortion to make that case, highlighting a budget the governor signed that included abortion restrictions and the Executive Council's recent vote to defund Planned Parenthood and family planning providers. (Sununu does not have a vote on the council and 
called the vote
 "incredibly disappointing" in a statement.) Despite the state trending blue at the federal level, Republicans are convinced that first-term Sen. Maggie Hassan is highly vulnerable, and both sides admit this race isn't likely to look like 2020, when Sen. Jeanne Shaheen won reelection by nearly 16 points. But Sununu keeps pushing back his timeline for making a decision about running, so, for now, Hassan has the race largely to herself. She released 
her first TV ad
 earlier this month -- a positive spot that touches on her father's service in World War II and her own work for veterans. Even if the governor doesn't run, however, Hassan could have a strong challenger in former Sen. Kelly Ayotte, whom the Democrat beat by just over 1,000 votes in 2016.
7. Nevada
Incumbent: Democrat Catherine Cortez Masto
Democratic Sen. Catherine Cortez Masto finally has a high-profile opponent in 
former Nevada Attorney General Adam Laxalt
, whom national Republicans had long eyed as the top challenger but who officially launched his campaign at the end of August. He's the rare GOP candidate who was 
recruited by Senate Minority Leader Mitch McConnell 
and has Trump's endorsement, making it more likely he'll have the GOP field mostly to himself as other ambitious Republicans jockey for the gubernatorial nomination. As Tump's campaign co-chair in the Silver State, Laxalt followed the former President's lead on false charges of voter fraud, for which Trump praised him in offering his endorsement last month, and he's already 
made some noise
 about filing lawsuits in 2022. Democrats are hoping his embrace of Trump's election fraud narrative will help tie him to the former President and turn off voters in a state that Biden carried last fall. His position on abortion could be also be litigated in the general election, especially since Nevada has a history of GOP leaders who have been more supportive of abortion rights, like former GOP Gov. Brian Sandoval. Democrats hope to argue that Laxalt is out of touch with voters on the issue. Still, Biden only carried the Silver State by just over 2 points, and Cortez Masto is running for her first reelection, so Democrats aren't taking anything for granted here, especially with an uncertain post-pandemic electorate. 
8. Florida
Incumbent: Republican Marco Rubio
GOP Sen. Marco Rubio starts with the advantage in this state that Trump carried by 3 points last year. But Democratic Rep. Val Demings, who outraised Rubio in the second quarter, is proving to be a strong fundraiser who could give the Republican senator a real race. Rubio is trying to 
tie Demings to "the socialist squad"
 and Democrats' physical and human infrastructure bills. (Rubio 
voted against
 the bipartisan $1 trillion infrastructure bill in the Senate last month.) Demings has 
attacked Rubio
 for traveling to Iowa late last month while Florida is dealing with the Delta variant surge.  
9. Ohio
Incumbent: Republican Rob Portman (retiring)
GOP Sen. Rob Portman's decision to retire has opened up a crowded GOP primary, with most contenders trying to "outTrump" each other in a state the former President won by 8 points. State Sen. Matt Dolan, who entered the race this week, cuts a more moderate profile. He supports the bipartisan infrastructure bill that Portman negotiated, according to an interview with 
Cleveland.com
, and has been 
critical
 of Trump's election lies. But it's unclear how much traction he can get in a GOP primary where the former President's influence is king with the base. Trump already attacked Dolan, whose family owns Cleveland's baseball team, for "cancel culture" because they 
decided to change
 the team's name. Former state treasurer Josh Mandel has been courting that conservative base hard, 
attacking refugees
 despite his own family history. JD Vance, the author of "Hillbilly Elegy," has been leading in earned media attention and is wracking up endorsements from conservative leaders like Missouri Sen. Josh Hawley and Indiana Rep. Jim Banks, the chair of the largest conservative caucus in the House. Those endorsements could help compensate for his prior criticism of Trump, which his opponents are eager to use against him. Former state party chair Jane Timken, businessmen Mike Gibbons and Bernie Moreno are also running. On the Democratic side, Rep. Tim Ryan recently got a challenge from his left in Morgan Harper, who's 
arguing
 that she can drive the minority turnout needed to turn Ohio blue. Harper lost a 2020 primary challenge to Rep. Joyce Beatty, who's now the chair of the Congressional Black Caucus and has backed Ryan.
10. Missouri
Incumbent: Republican Roy Blunt (retiring)
Missouri continues to occupy the 10th spot on this list because of the chance that the Republican nominee to replace retiring Sen. Roy Blunt will give Democrats an opening. But it would be a massively uphill climb for Democrats to flip this seat blue in a state that Trump won by 15 points. Their best hope is former Gov. Eric Greitens, who resigned from office following a probe into allegations of sexual and campaign misconduct, winning the GOP nomination and creating a Todd Akin situation. The 2012 Senate nominee's "legitimate rape" comments cost Republicans the Missouri Senate seat and imperiled GOP nominees across the country. Greitens, who has been picking up endorsements from Trump world -- recently former national security adviser Michael Flynn, for example -- hardly has the field to himself. Attorney General Eric Schmitt is running, with his super PAC allies leaning into his suit against mask mandates in schools to tout his candidacy. Reps. Billy Long and Vicky Hartzler are also running, as is Mark McCloskey, whom the Republican governor 
pardoned
 last month after he and his wife had pleaded guilty to misdemeanor charges for pointing guns at protesters near their home last summer. While GOP voters will have plenty of candidates to choose from, more candidates means a more splintered vote, which could lower the threshold it takes for Greitens to win the nomination. 
The internal assessment, known as a "hotwash," will examine "everything that happened in this entire operation from start to finish and the areas of improvement, where we can do better, where we can find holes or weaknesses and plug them as we go forward," national security adviser Jake Sullivan said last month. 
But administration officials and members of Congress are not waiting for that analysis to start pointing fingers. The White House has publicly blamed many external factors for the chaos, including former President Donald Trump's February 2020 
deal with the Taliban 
and the Afghan security forces themselves, who 
President Joe Biden 
and his aides have said refused to fight for their own country. 
Privately, White House and State Department officials have grumbled about why they are getting the bulk of the blame rather than the intelligence community, which they say failed to predict just how quickly Kabul would fall. Many officials are also angry at the rosier assessments presented by US envoy Zalmay Khalilzad, who they say should have been more realistic about the Taliban's true intentions. 
But intelligence officials and lawmakers in both parties charge that the White House is trying to use the intelligence community as a scapegoat. They argue that the National Security Council and the State Department ignored the grim intelligence assessments in the spring and summer that warned the government could quickly collapse -- and that the White House overruled the Pentagon's desire to keep US troops in Afghanistan before Biden originally announced the withdrawal in April. 
The private quarreling is poised to quickly spill into public view with lawmakers on both sides of the aisle -- newly incensed following the
 deaths of 13 service members 
and at least 170 Afghans last week at the hands of ISIS -- preparing for public hearings beginning this month on the administration's handling of the withdrawal. Republicans have hammered Biden's response to the crisis, and the hearings will give them a public forum to criticize the President and the response heading into the 2022 midterm elections.
"Everything that's happening in Afghanistan right now lays solely at the feet of Joe Biden," Rep. Mike Rogers of Alabama, the top Republican on the House Armed Services Committee, told CNN last week. "He made the final decision. He's the reason we left the way we left." 
Biden's top national security officials -- Sullivan, Secretary of State Antony Blinken, Defense Secretary Lloyd Austin and Joint Chiefs of Staff Chairman Gen. Mark Milley -- have all been targets for criticism, too, as the situation in Afghanistan deteriorated. Some Republicans have called for their resignations, and most are likely to be hauled to Capitol Hill to testify in the coming weeks.
White House officials have closed ranks
White House officials say there has been no talk of firings or dismissals in meetings with Biden, someone who has long been fiercely loyal to his closest advisers. They've closed ranks around Sullivan, focused more on making sure he had the support to do his job than trying to undercut him, two officials said.
"We aren't the Trump White House," one official cracked. Several officials said they know the attempts to point fingers or cast blame among the various agencies participating in the evacuation will be intense in the coming days as officials move to protect their own equities.  
But the White House has kept a close eye on the criticism, particularly from Democratic corners, multiple officials said. While officials say they know congressional hearings and investigations are coming, they also know Democrats control those committees in both chambers. At least for now.
Amid the intensified scrutiny, the White House has in recent days been phoning Democratic lawmakers -- including the chairman of the Senate Intelligence Committee, Sen. Mark Warner of Virginia -- and urging them to publicly defend the administration's response, people familiar with the outreach said. A spokeswoman for Warner declined to comment. 
So far, however, such support has been hard to come by. Warner and Democratic Sen. Bob Menendez of New Jersey, the chairman of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, have been highly critical of the evacuation operation and neither has defended the President publicly. 
Even Biden's closest ally in the Senate, Democratic Sen. Chris Coons of Delaware, 
has indicated his support 
for "a thorough after-action review about the strikingly rapid fall of the Afghan military and government, the planning and coordination for an evacuation, and the alarming crush of Afghans and Americans now urgently seeking to leave Kabul." 
Some Democrats have defended Biden, like Sen. Chris Murphy of Connecticut, who said on CNN's "State of the Union" Sunday that the chaos surrounding the evacuation was likely to occur no matter when the Afghan government fell.
"When Congress does this oversight, I want to make sure that it's over the last 20 years, not just the last two months," Murphy said. "Because to believe that there was some way to do this evacuation in a way that didn't have panic on the ground, that didn't have a risk of loss of life, I think is the same kind of fantasy thinking that led us to stay in Afghanistan for 10 years too long, even when we knew the Afghan forces couldn't stand up for themselves."
In his speech marking the end of the 20-year war Wednesday, Biden defended the decision to withdraw and the chaotic evacuation operation that followed, saying he was "not going to extend this forever war." The President said the US withdrawal was conducted under the assumption that 300,000 Afghan security forces would be a "strong adversary" to fight against the Taliban.
"That assumption -- that the Afghan government would be able to hold on for a period of time beyond military drawdown -- turned out not to be accurate," Biden acknowledged.
Warning signs of a rapid Taliban takeover missed? 
The handling of the evacuation and the acute terrorist threats that ultimately resulted in the deadly suicide bombing last Thursday will be scrutinized heavily. But the larger question will be how the administration was caught so off guard by the complete Taliban takeover of the country, to the point that the US military was forced to rely on its former enemies to 
provide Americans with safe passage
 to Kabul's airport. 
Intelligence officials, for their part, say they are not to blame. One senior intelligence official noted that a rapid Taliban takeover was consistently presented to policymakers as a real possibility. As recently as last month, another source said, the intelligence community assessed that the Taliban were pursuing a full military takeover of the country rather than a negotiated political settlement. 
But Biden and the National Security Council chose to put greater stock in the more optimistic assessments that the Afghan government would be able to hold out for at least a year, other officials said, long enough for the US to complete a withdrawal and evacuation before a Taliban takeover.
"We consistently identified the risk of a rapid collapse of the Afghan government. We also grew more pessimistic about the government's survival as the fighting season progressed," a senior intelligence official recently told CNN.
The disconnect over the intelligence has played out publicly. After the Taliban took control of Kabul, Milley commented on the intelligence assessment at a Pentagon news conference, saying the time frame of the Afghan government's collapse "was widely estimated and ranged from weeks to months and even years following our departure." 
"There was nothing that I or anyone else saw that indicated a collapse of this army and this government in 11 days," Milley said.
But a former intelligence official with experience in Afghanistan argued that the assessment of the government falling within weeks "puts anyone on notice that imminent collapse is likely."
"That's the opposite of an intelligence failure," the former official said. 
Why didn't evacuations start earlier?
Even with rosier assessments in hand, the situation on the ground nevertheless deteriorated rapidly with the Taliban advancing across Afghanistan in the weeks before they overran Kabul. As a result, one question lawmakers will home in on is why evacuations of Americans and Afghans who had helped the US military over two decades didn't start sooner, as it became clearer that the Taliban were winning. 
"There were numerous indicators that this was possible," said Rep. Jason Crow, a Colorado Democrat and former Army Ranger on the House Intelligence Committee. "In fact, a number of members of Congress, including me, going back to April, have warned that we could be in a situation like this, and that's why we've actually been pushing for the SIV (Special Immigrant Visa program) evacuation to begin months ago."
In mid-July, a group of US diplomats 
wrote a classified cable 
to Blinken warning that swift action needed to be taken because they believed the situation could rapidly deteriorate and they feared a catastrophe. A task force to help Special Immigrant Visas applicants get processed wasn't started until July, just weeks before the Afghan government's collapse.
The White House has said the administration didn't want to create the impression, through mass evacuations early on, that Afghan President Ashraf Ghani was incapable of holding together his government as the Taliban advanced. 
But even as the Taliban gained more territory, the withdrawal of US troops and contractors continued apace, leaving the Afghan security forces increasingly vulnerable. Afghan Gen. Sami Sadat, pushing back on Biden's claim that "American troops cannot and should not be fighting in a war and dying in a war that Afghan forces are not willing to fight for themselves," recalled in a
 recent op-ed 
how Afghan helicopter pilots were effectively grounded when departing contractors, on orders from the Pentagon, removed their missile-defense systems. The removal of those systems was confirmed by a person with direct knowledge of the matter.
Rep. Mike Quigley, an Illinois Democrat on the House Intelligence Committee, said there were long-term signs that the Afghan security forces would be unable to operate on their own. 
"I think the principal thing you look at is was there an honest assessment" from the Pentagon of the Afghan military, Quigley said. "I'd talk to the generals."
Multiple US officials have instead suggested that much of the blame for what is unfolding in Kabul rests with Sullivan and the National Security Council, which despite holding a high volume of meetings on Afghanistan in recent months has often lacked decisiveness when it comes to implementing policy recommendations. 
One official characterized the council's deliberation process on Afghanistan, including the evacuation, as "paralyzing," adding that the current policy confusion and uncertainty is similar to the "hand-wringing and indecisiveness of the Obama administration."
"I think the IC got it right," said Rep. Mike McCaul of Texas, the top Republican on the House Foreign Affairs Committee. "They had a very grim assessment the whole summer leading up to this, and they just ignored it and they decided to go with this rosy State Department dream that we're going to work out some agreement with the Taliban at the last minute, and guess what -- it didn't work."
Public fight brewing
The contradicting explanations and behind-the-scenes finger pointing are just the start of what's likely to become a public fight playing out in high-profile congressional hearings.
House Foreign Affairs Chairman Gregory Meeks, a New York Democrat, said last week that he's considering bringing his committee back early from the House's monthlong recess in order to hear publicly from Blinken. Multiple Senate committees are preparing for hearings with top officials. 
"I don't know who's said what to the President yet," said Rep. Jim Langevin, a Rhode Island Democrat who has been critical of the administration's evacuation.
Langevin said he wanted to hear from Biden's senior national security advisers "to actually ask those pointed questions about who told the President what, and who ultimately made the decision despite what other maybe contrary views might have been offered." 
Many of the questions will go back to Biden's original decision to leave in April, when the President went against military leaders who were advocating for keeping US troops in Afghanistan longer. Lawmakers are also likely to press on the slow pace of evacuations before the Taliban took control last month through the decision to rely on the Taliban for security at the Kabul airport and to finish the withdrawal despite Americans still stuck in Afghanistan who wanted to leave.
Republicans have charged that Biden bears the primary responsibility for what's unfolded in Afghanistan. House Minority Leader Kevin McCarthy has held numerous news conferences and public events over the past week with top GOP national security lawmakers to hit the President on Afghanistan, though the California Republican has struggled himself to say whether he would keep US troops in Afghanistan indefinitely. 
GOP members are preparing to question Biden's team on multiple fronts. They've requested that the Biden administration turn over its "evacuation plan" and called for top officials to testify. Republican Rep. Michael Waltz of Florida, who sits on the House Armed Services Committee, said on Monday that Khalilzad, the US lead in peace talks with the Taliban, "should be the first called before Congress." 
Seeing the chaos that has unfolded in Kabul, many officials turned their ire toward Khalilzad, given his central role in crafting the Trump administration deal with the Taliban last year that required US troops to be out of Afghanistan by May 1, 2021 -- a deal that the White House has said effectively tied Biden's hands and left the administration no choice but to withdraw US forces without requiring any real concessions from the Taliban. 
One senior Western official who had been involved in the talks, however, noted that Biden had long been determined to withdraw US troops from Afghanistan. The official said that some in the administration have therefore viewed keeping Khalilzad in his role as a way to have a "fall guy" who could shoulder much of the blame if things went awry. The State Department said Wednesday that Khalilzad had returned to Washington from Doha, Qatar, where the US is relocating its Afghanistan diplomatic presence.
"Why keep him involved when everything has gone so wrong?" the Western official said. "One reason is because you fundamentally just don't want to change the policy of surrender and withdrawal."
"I asked her, the VP, today, because she's the most qualified person to do it, to lead our efforts with Mexico and the Northern Triangle, and the countries that can help, need help in stemming the movement of so many folks, stemming the migration to our southern border," Biden told reporters ahead of an immigration meeting in the White House State Dining Room.
"I said when we became a team and got elected that the vice president was going to be the last person in the room," he said. "She doesn't realize that means she gets every assignment."
The task mimics Biden's own efforts in 2014 and 2015, when he was asked by then-President Barack Obama to lead diplomatic efforts in Guatemala, Honduras and El Salvador after a surge of unaccompanied minors from those countries began arriving in the US.
Migrants are again arriving at the border at increased levels, causing a scramble by the administration to accommodate them and a political problem for the White House.
"Thank you, Mr. President, for having the confidence in me. There is no question that this is a challenging situation," Harris said on Wednesday. "While we are clear that people should not come to the border now, we also understand that we will enforce the law and that we also -- because we can chew gum and walk at the same time -- must address the root causes that cause people to make the trek, as the President has described, to come here."
Officials said Harris would focus her efforts on stemming the current flow of migrants and on developing a larger strategic partnership with Central American countries based on respect and shared values.
"Starting today, the Northern Triangle and Mexico will know there is one senior official dedicated to this effort," a senior administration official said on Wednesday in previewing Harris' new role.
The vice president, until now, had not been tasked with a key portfolio issue distinct from Biden. Instead, she acted as a "full partner" to Biden, appearing often physically alongside him on all the administration's efforts, including their self-proclaimed top priority of managing the coronavirus pandemic.
Those close to Harris said 
foreign policy and national security are key areas she wants to develop in her portfolio
, and she's taken steps to beef up her experience since taking office, including by speaking with foreign foreign leaders.
During her own presidential run, Harris said she would expand the use of deferred action immigration programs and utilize executive actions to remove the threat of deportation of millions of undocumented people in the US if elected president.
She said earlier Wednesday in an interview with CBS News that the White House was frustrated by the current situation.
"Look, we've been in office less than 100 days," she said. "We are addressing it. We are dealing with it, but it's going to take some time, and are we frustrate? Are you frustrated? Yes, we are."
Officials said Harris would rely on her experience as attorney general and senator from California, a border state, to inform her diplomatic efforts.
They said she would be supported by officials from the Cabinet, including the State Department and USAID, and was likely speak with the leaders of key countries, though did not have specific phone calls to preview.
Officials said Biden brought Harris into the new role because of an inherent level of trust.
"He has experience and lived through this process as vice president himself," an official said. "Biden has said over and over again the person that I trust most, the person I turn to when there's a hard issue, is Kamala Harris."
Still, a separate official said Harris would approach the matter differently than Biden, who traveled to Guatemala City in 2015 for a trilateral meeting with the leaders of Guatemala, El Salvador and Honduras in part to develop solutions to issue of migrants from those countries coming en masse to the United States.
"Vice President Harris taking on this challenge in her own style, in her own way," the official said.
A version of this story appeared in CNN's What Matters newsletter. To get it in your inbox, sign up for free 
here
. 
Human rights activists are condemning images of US border agents, mounted on horseback, trying to head off migrants 
almost as if they're herding cattle
. The US special envoy to Haiti, Daniel Foote, has now 
resigned to protest the Biden administration's "inhumane" effort 
to send them back to Haiti.
At the same time, conservative lawmakers are accusing the Biden administration of failing to head off another crisis at the border and the distressing images of the massive migrant camp in Del Rio, Texas, back up that idea. 
How Haitian migrants, would-be refugees fleeing an island nation that is rocked by political instability and economic depression, converged at once at the US-Mexico border in a specific spot in Texas is complicated. So is the question of will happen to them next. 
Read the latest report from CNN's Priscilla Alvarez and Rosa Flores
.
What's happening now:
More than 10,000 Haitians converged in recent days near Del Rio, Texas, and have sought to stream into the US, 
creating a massive migrant camp 
under an overhead bridge between Coahuila, Mexico, and Del Rio, while they wait for access.
Department of Homeland Security Secretary Alejandro Mayorkas has promised the US will clear out the camp in the coming days.
Traffic between the US and Mexico has been disrupted, 
interrupting life in those towns
.
Mounted border agents in were 
filmed using aggressive tactics
, drawing 
condemnation
. Mayorkas said on CNN that he was were "
horrified
" by the images.
The Texas governor ordered a 
miles-long drive-up border wall of parked vehicles
. 
The Biden administration is using a Trump-era Covid policy to fly 
thousands of Haitians back to Port-au-Prince
 after days of detaining them in the US, and left them there, causing chaos at the airport there.
DHS officials have desperately warned Haitians not to come to the border and said they would be turned away.
CNN has 
witnessed some Haitians being driven across the border
 and allowed to enter the country.
DHS has also been moving thousands of migrants from Del Rio to other processing sites.
How big is this surge?
The numbers are incredible; the number of migrants swelled from about 400 to a max of 14,000 in days.
More could be on the way according to CNN's Alvarez, who writes: 
There are up to 30,000 Haitians in Colombia who may be seeking to travel north, CNN has learned. The department is tracking between 40,000 to 60,000 Haitians in the hemisphere, though they are not necessarily seeking to come to the US, according to the congressional aide. Recently, Mexico also stopped some buses of Haitians coming north, DHS said, according to the aide.
Why are Haitians, specifically, coming to the US border?
Back in May, Mayorkas announced an 18-month temporary protective status for Haitians already residing in the US, which now applies to Haitians in the country as of July 29. Mayorkas had cited "security concerns, social unrest, an increase in human rights abuses, crippling poverty, and lack of basic resources, which are exacerbated by the Covid-19 pandemic." And that spring announcement was before Haiti's president was assassinated and an earthquake struck over the summer. 
Many of those arriving at the US border now had left Haiti long ago and were either living or staying in other Central and South American countries, from Guatemala to Chile. 
CNN talked to 26-year-old Jameson Tilus. He fled Haiti years ago after he was assaulted in his home and his aunt was shot at. 
In Chile since 2015, he wants to join his brother, uncle and cousins, who are in the US. Friends told his family the border was open in Del Rio, so Tilus, his wife, their 5 year-old daughter and their 3 year-old son started the two-month journey there.
"I'm 26 years old, and I don't have a profession," Tilus said, his voice breaking. "I was doing very badly, I wanted a better life."
Read more
. 
What's the US plan?
Here's what Mayorkas told lawmakers after visiting the border Monday:
"The plan that we have is a multi-part plan.
One is to address the root causes of irregular migration. 
Two is to ensure that there are safe, orderly, and humane pathways so people do not have to take the dangerous perilous journey to make a claim of asylum that our laws that Congress passed are recognized. 
And third is to rebuild our asylum system here in the United States." 
What are the critics saying?
Patrice Lawrence leads the group UndocuBlack, which advocates for undocumented Black people in the US. She 
writes for CNN 
that the Biden administration should be distinguishing itself from the Trump administration and allowing for a more orderly asylum process rather than flying Haitians back to Haiti.
"The Biden administration could have made a strong statement in favor of due process and dignity by allowing for an orderly asylum process. Instead, it has opted for mass expulsions of vulnerable people."
On the other side of the spectrum is Texas Republican Gov. Greg Abbott and his wall of police cars. 
"When you have an administration that is not enforcing the law in this country, when you have an administration that has abandoned any pretense of securing the border and securing our sovereignty, you see the onrush of people like what we saw walking across this dam that is right behind me," Abbott said at a news conference in Val Verde County.
This story has been updated to reflect the latest developments. 
Dr. Janet Woodcock is serving 
as the acting leader of the agency, but legally she can stay on as acting head only through November 15, unless a permanent commissioner is nominated.
Last month, the White House would not predict what the timeline was for nominating a permanent head. 
"The role of the FDA commissioner is critically important, as you all know, especially during the Covid-19 pandemic," White House 
deputy press secretary Karine Jean-Pierre
 told reporters Tuesday. "We have strong acting leadership in place that is playing an important role in our Covid-19 response and beyond, and look forward to sharing a nominee with the required expertise and leadership for this job, so hopefully we have something soon to share." 
When asked Tuesday if he has a nominee in mind, Biden said: "We'll be talking about that in a little bit."
While 
Woodcock was once considered a top contender 
for the permanent position, administration officials told CNN she was no longer in the running after she came under fire from several Senate Democrats over the agency's role in the opioid crisis. But with roughly 40 days until her time is up, the White House has not indicated who might be under consideration for the position. 
The deadline comes as the White House has another key health leadership role to fill, with the decision of 
Dr. Francis Collins, the National Institutes of Health director
, to step down by the end of the year. Collins has led the agency for more than a decade. 
Sources close to the FDA nomination process said the administration has spent time over the last 10 months looking at recommendations for the role, including from former FDA commissioners, and even putting some candidates through a vetting process, only to come up short so far. 
There has been an emphasis on looking for someone who understands the communication challenges of public health and the agency, rather than just focusing on an academic -- prompted by what some see as verbal missteps from 
Dr. Rochelle Walensky
, who helms the US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
While the 
FDA granted full approval to Pfizer's coronavirus vaccine
 in August under Woodcock's leadership, health officials say having a permanent head is critical.
"The lack of an FDA commissioner now, nine months into the Biden administration, I think is something that a lot of people just do not understand," said Dr. Leana Wen, an emergency physician and professor of health policy and management at the George Washington University who's a CNN medical analyst. "Think about what's on the FDA's docket right now: 
boosters
, vaccines 
for younger kids
, treatments, tests even that are approved by the FDA ... it's long past time for President Biden to nominate a permanent director there."
Lawmakers have also expressed frustration. 
"Frankly, this nomination is long overdue," said Sen. Richard Burr of North Carolina, the top Republican on the Senate Health, Education, Labor and Pensions Committee. "The FDA has played a vital role in leading our pandemic response ... and has largely performed that role well. But beyond the pandemic, it's going to be incumbent on the FDA, working with Congress, to start applying the lessons we've learned during this crisis, so we're better prepared for the next public health threat and the next generation of medical breakthroughs."
There's also a danger in Woodcock leading the FDA past the November deadline with no named nominee, as it could open the agency to challenges to her authority and any actions under her watch. During the Trump administration, which chronically kept people in acting positions, officials faced lawsuits that threatened to undo the policies they implemented while in office.
Complicating matters even more is some recent internal turmoil at the agency.
Last month, 
two senior leaders in the vaccine review office
 announced they were stepping down, even as the agency is working toward high-profile decisions around Covid-19 vaccine approvals, authorizations for younger children and booster shots. The retirements of Dr. Marion Gruber, director of the Office of Vaccines Research and Review at FDA's Center for Biologics Evaluation and Research, and Dr. Philip Krause, deputy director of the office, were announced in an internal agency email.
After the announcement, 
Woodcock told FDA staff 
that the agency was operating in "difficult times."
"Following today's announcement that Marion and Phil have decided to retire, I wanted to reach out to reiterate my full support and complete confidence in your ability to continue delivering on the agency's mandate to deliver safe, effective and high-quality vaccines to the American people," Woodcock said in a separate email to staff that was sent to CNN at the time.
And soon the White House will have Collins' leadership role to fill at the National Institutes of Health. The White House said Tuesday that it expects to nominate someone for the position before he leaves.  
Although two candidates have been in the running for the top job for months, Biden has ultimately settled on neither, leaving the agency without permanent leadership as it plays a critical role in the pandemic response, including overseeing the development and authorization of coronavirus vaccines. Last month, six former FDA commissioners urged Biden to select someone soon, in part to boost agency morale after it was battered by his predecessor.
"They want leadership. Being in limbo is difficult for them," a former top FDA official told CNN about the need for permanent leadership. "The FDA is front and center."
Not only is the agency at the center of the pandemic response, but it's still tasked with regulating products, drug and food inspections, approving new drugs and more. 
The agency is currently being run by Dr. Janet Woodcock, who was named acting commissioner in January. Woodcock is one of the two candidates under consideration for the job but has received stiff opposition from a handful of lawmakers over her handling of the opioid epidemic -- pushback that some worry could imperil her chances. 
While previous FDA commissioners and current officials have praised Woodcock, she has come under scrutiny for how liberally the FDA approved opioids when she ran the drug division within the agency.
Woodcock is a rheumatologist and internal medicine specialist who has been at FDA since 1986. She was the director of the Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, the FDA arm that approves new drugs, for two separate stints dating back to 1994. She has also served as the acting commissioner previously. Woodcock commands respect inside the agency because of the decades she has spent there, and her understanding of how it operates, but her track record has also earned criticism from some Democrats, who could stand in the way of her confirmation.
While Woodcock was initially seen as the leading choice, another candidate under consideration was Dr. Joshua Sharfstein, the former principal deputy FDA commissioner during the Obama administration, who also served as the Baltimore city health commissioner and Maryland's health secretary. He's currently an associate dean at the Johns Hopkins Bloomberg School of Public Health. As discussions have gone on, multiple sources told CNN it now appears less likely that Sharfstein will ultimately get the nod from Biden for the Senate-confirmed position.
The search for the next commissioner is being led by the White House. Although Xavier Becerra was recently confirmed as the new Health and Human Services secretary, other Biden allies have reached out to potential candidates about the job. One recently reached out to Dr. Eric Topol of the Scripps Translational Research Institute to sound him out on the role, but he wasn't interested, two people familiar with the conversation told CNN. And in a sign of how the search could ultimately end up where it began, one outside Biden adviser recently reached out to Dr. Stephen Hahn, the FDA commissioner under former President Donald Trump, to gauge his opinion on Woodcock.
"In the midst of a pandemic, the choice of FDA commissioner is critically important," a White House official told CNN about the search. "We take seriously our obligation to find a candidate with strong technical, management, and communications experience. In the meantime, we are grateful to have strong career leadership in place."
The fierce public discussion over who will be the next FDA commissioner is unusual, but the role has only become more prominent since the coronavirus pandemic and former President Trump's repeated assault on the agency.
Multiple current and former administration officials told CNN that morale at the FDA has been eroded by the intense workload brought on by the pandemic and the barrage of attacks by Trump. Without evidence, Trump once accused the FDA of delaying coronavirus treatments in order to hurt his re-election chances and stated that career officials were working against him. Before leaving office, he called the FDA "a big, old, slow turtle" and told Hahn, the commissioner at the time, to "get the dam vaccines out NOW."
Tensions between the White House and FDA became so stressed that, last December, then-chief of staff Mark Meadows called Hahn and told him he needed to grant an emergency use authorization for Pfizer/BioNTech's vaccine by the end of the week, or resign.
A former top health official in the Trump administration told CNN that kind of sustained political pressure took a toll on the agency now searching for new leadership. 
"I do think morale is an issue, particularly with President Trump's tweets," the former official told CNN. "It hurt and it hurt substantially."
As the search for Biden's commissioner has been underway, there have also been calls to make the position independent and give it a set term like the FBI director, who serves 10 years regardless of the president's political party.
"Having a set term, potentially that's outside of the political schedule if you will, I think there is some real benefits to the consideration of that," Hahn told CNN's Sanjay Gupta during a coronavirus special Sunday night.
In a statement, the top US diplomat said that 
President Joe Biden
 "has instructed the Department of State to reengage immediately and robustly with the UN Human Rights Council."
The United States will begin that engagement in an observer role, Blinken said, "and in that capacity will have the opportunity to speak in the Council, participate in negotiations, and partner with others to introduce resolutions."
The UN Secretary General welcomed the US decision. Spokesperson StMore than 2 million people have already received third doses of Pfizer's coronavirus vaccine, but these technically were not booster shots -- they were extra doses given to people whose immune systems are compromised and may not have responded fully to the first two doses of vaccines.
But now the CDC and FDA have agreed many Americans need boosters and should start getting them. Here are some important things to know about them:
Who is eligible?
Many adults will be eligible for boosters if they have already received two doses of Pfizer's vaccine.
"Starting today, if you are six months out from your last dose of the Pfizer vaccine, you are eligible for a booster if you fall into one of three high risk groups," US Surgeon General Dr. Vivek Murthy told a White House Covid-19 briefing Friday.
"Number one: You are 65 or older. Number two: You have a medical condition that puts you at high risk of severe illness with Covid and these conditions include obesity, diabetes, high blood pressure, chronic kidney disease and others. And Number three: You work or live in a setting where you are at high risk of exposure to Covid. This includes health care workers, teachers, those living in shelters or prisons and grocery store workers."
The federal government website at
 vaccines.gov
 has links to pages outlining who is eligible for a booster shot and has lists of locations where shots are available.
The CDC's Dr. Kathleen Dooling told the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices earlier this week there is a wide variety of people who might be included in the high risk groups. "Fully vaccinated persons with underlying medical conditions may be at risk of severe COVID-19 if they become infected with SARS-CoV-2," she said. They include cancer, stroke, chronic kidney disease, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease or COPD, diabetes, heart conditions, obesity, pregnancy and smoking.
White House Covid-19 coordinator Jeff Zients said up to 20 million Americans fall into these categories as of now.
When and where can people get one?
People have already started getting booster shots.
Zients said there is plenty of supply, and people should be able to get boosters at pharmacies, doctors' offices and sometimes at mass vaccination sites.
"Boosters will be free for everyone, regardless of immigration or health insurance status. No ID or insurance required," he said Friday.
"And we've worked closely with partners including governors, pharmacies, doctors, long term care facilities and other providers so that eligible Americans are able to get a booster shot at roughly 80,000 places across the country, including over 40,000 local pharmacies," Zients added.
"CDC contacted tens of thousands of nursing homes, assisted living facilities, and other high-risk settings to ensure that they are ready," he said.
"Colorado has nine mobile vaccination clinics ready to go to get boosters to where people are. And we'll double that number to 18 over the coming weeks."
He said Colorado, New York, Ohio and other states were readying large vaccination centers if there is demand.
What about everyone elseThe new requirements could apply
 to as many as 100 million Americans -- close to two-thirds of the American workforce -- and amount to Biden's strongest push yet to require vaccines for much of the country.
"We've been patient, but our patience is wearing thin, and your refusal has cost all of us," Biden said, his tone hardening toward Americans who still refuse to receive a vaccine despite ample evidence of their safety and full approval of one -- the Pfizer-BioNTech Covid-19 vaccine -- from the US Food and Drug Administration.
He said vaccinated America was growing "frustrated" with the 80 million people who have not received shots and are fueling the spread of the virus. And he acknowledged the new steps would not provide a quick fix.
"While America is in much better shape than it was seven months ago when I took office, I need to tell you a second fact: We're in a tough stretch and it could last for awhile," Biden said in an early evening speech from the White House.
At the center of Biden's new plan is directing the Labor Department to require all businesses with 100 or more employees ensure their workers are either vaccinated or tested once a week, an expansive step the President took after consultation with administration health officials and lawyers. Companies could face thousands of dollars in fines per employee if they don't comply.
US Postal Service workers would fall under that rule, a senior administration official told CNN, and employees will be required to be vaccinated or face mandatory weekly testing. The Postal Service, a quasi independent agency, employees more than 640,000 people.
Biden also signed an executive order requiring all government employees be vaccinated against Covid-19, with no option of being regularly tested to opt out. The President signed an accompanying order directing the same standard be applied to employees of contractors who do business with the federal government.
He said 300,000 educators in federal Head Start programs must be vaccinated and called on governors to require vaccinations for schoolteachers and staff.
And Biden announced he would require the 17 million health care workers at facilities receiving funds from Medicare and Medicaid to be fully vaccinated, expanding the mandate to hospitals, home care facilities and dialysis centers around the country.
"We have the tools to combat the virus if we come together to use those tools," Biden said at the outset of what was billed as a major speech to tackle the latest phase of the Covid-19 pandemic.
The new rules amount to the most dramatic steps to date to get more Americans vaccinated. Once cautious of vaccine mandates, the Biden administration is now wholly embracing them as vaccine hesitancy persists among certain groups.
Administration officials acknowledged the requirement for large employers could be challenged in court. But they said their hope was to provide cover of federal rules to businesses who want to require vaccines for employees.
The new rules come as the Delta variant tears through communities across the country, causing upticks in hospitalizations and deaths particularly in areas where vaccination rates remain low.
A potentially massive impact on the US workforce
Wide swaths of the American workforce could be impacted by the new rules, which would take effect over the coming weeks. The new "emergency temporary standard" from the Labor Department will require large employers to give their workers paid time off to get vaccinated. If businesses don't comply, the government will "take enforcement actions," which could include "substantial fines up to nearly $14,000 per violation, according to officials. 
Officials said the standard was a "minimum," and some companies may choose to go further, including by mandating the vaccine instead of offering a test-out alternative.
"Each employer will decide exactly what they want to do, but what we're saying through the Department of Labor rule making process is a minimum of testing once a week or full vaccination," a senior administration official said.
The new announcements move beyond what Biden announced earlier this summer, when he required federal workers be vaccinated but allowed for those who opted out to be subject to stringent mitigation measures. Now, federal employees will have 75 days to get vaccinated or risk being fired.
"The expectation is if you want to work in the federal government or want to be a contractor, you need to be vaccinated," press secretary Jen Psaki said, adding the number of unvaccinated federal workers was still being compiled. Officials said limited exemptions would apply to workers claiming medical or religious reasons for not getting vaccinated.
The White House has said the federal government should act as a 
model for other businesses
 in their own vaccine mandates, and has praised large companies that require employees to be vaccinated. 
President takes other measures to tackle Delta
Biden on Thursday also announced a major expansion to free testing, a step public health officials have said is critical to containing the virus, particularly as children return to school and some workers return to offices.
The Defense Production Act, a wartime measure used to compel companies to manufacture essential supplies, will be evoked to accelerate the production of rapid tests and the administration is planning to send 25 million free tests to US health clinics, officials said. Some retailers, like Amazon, Kroger and Walmart, will sell the at-home tests at cost.
In addition, Biden called on large entertainment venues to require proof of vaccination or negative tests for patrons seeking entry. And he said the Transportation Safety Administration would double fines on passengers who refuse to wear masks on planes. 
"If you break the rules, be prepared to pay Traditionally, the party out of the White House does better in the midterms. But the surging Delta variant, a chaotic withdrawal from Afghanistan and intra-party fissures on Capitol Hill have all threatened Biden's agenda -- and his ability to communicate it throughout the summer -- giving Republicans more to work with as they try to retake the Senate.  
Biden's approval rating stood at 52% in 
a recent CNN poll 
conducted by SSRS, with 69% of Americans saying things are going badly in this country. Sixty-two percent of Americans said that economic conditions in the US are poor -- up from 45% in April. That's bad news for Democrats, who only enjoy a majority because Vice President Kamala Harris is the tie-breaking vote in the chamber. 
But it's far too early to assume that the national mood heading into the fall will look anything like the political climate of November 2022. 
And the worsening atmosphere for Biden hasn't yet altered which Senate races are most competitive. Pennsylvania, where GOP Sen. Pat Toomey is retiring, is still the seat most likely to flip partisan control -- for the sixth month of 
CNN's Senate race ranking
. The top 10 Senate seats most likely to flip are based on CNN's reporting and fundraising data, as well as historical data about how states and candidates have performed. As the cycle heats up, more polling and advertising spending data will become factors.
Despite the roadblocks on Capitol Hill -- many from within their own party, as moderates and progressives in both chambers squabble over timing, scope and size of legislation -- Democrats are hoping to have significant accomplishments to tout by this time next year. The Senate has already passed the bipartisan infrastructure bill, while a much more expansive economic package, if passed, would enact much of Biden's economic agenda. Republicans see a massive spending bill they can attack Democrats over, but Democrats are hoping it'll give them tangible kitchen table benefits to talk about, like lower prescription drug costs and paid family leave.
Republicans have also given Democrats some ammunition to fire up their base in an off-year election where turnout, on both sides, is an open question without former President Donald Trump on the ballot. Texas' six-week abortion ban has reinjected reproductive rights and the Supreme Court into the national conversation. Nationally, public opinion is firmly on the side of abortion rights -- 
fewer than one-third of Americans
 want to see the Roe v. Wade decision overturned, according to a set of three polls released over the past week. It depends what state they're running in, but Democrats may look to use this issue to paint their GOP opponents as out of touch, especially in places like Nevada and New Hampshire.
The map of competitive Senate races doesn't look anything like California, which Biden carried by nearly 30 points last year, but Democrats have been heartened to see that running on Covid restrictions can be an effective message after this month's GOP-driven recall of California Gov. Gavin Newsom 
failed
. About 48% -- a plurality in 
the California exit poll 
-- said that the Democratic governor's coronavirus policies were "about right." Another 18% said they were "not strict enough." Nationally, support for vaccine mandates has grown, with more than half of Americans supporting them for the workplace, in-person classes and concerts and sporting events, 
according to CNN's recent poll
. 
One reason, Democratic and Republican strategists agreed, that Newsom was able to capitalize on that message is 
he had a foil in Republican Larry Elder
 and was able to credibly tie him to Trump. And while that may have worked uniquely well in California, Trump -- even without a social media presence -- is still leaving his footprint on primaries as he hand-picks some candidates and torches others. 
The former President, who had already endorsed in North Carolina earlier this summer, made endorsements in open GOP primaries in Pennsylvania, Georgia and Nevada over the past month, while Republicans in Ohio, Arizona and Missouri are still duking it out over fealty to him. 
It remains to be seen, however, just how much those endorsements matter.
Here are the 10 Senate seats most likely to flip next fall.
1. Pennsylvania
Incumbent: Republican Pat Toomey (retiring)
The biggest development in the Keystone State, which remains the seat most likely to flip partisan control, was Trump earlier this month wading into the GOP primary to replace retiring Sen. Pat Toomey. 
He backed Army veteran Sean Parnell
, who lost a 2020 House bid to Democratic Rep. Conor Lamb (who's running for the Democratic nod for this seat). Parnell already had support from the former President's son, Donald Trump Jr., so getting the elder Trump's backing wasn't a big surprise. But rather than doing anything to clear the field, the endorsement may be making this race more ugly, with businessman Jeff Bartos launching personal attacks on Parnell. Democrats are happy to see Republicans go after each other, while they attack the GOP on issues ranging from 
partisan audits
 to abortion restrictions. Montgomery County Commissioner Val Arkoosh, for example, who's running with the backing of EMILY's List and 314 Action, has been outspoken about the threat to abortion rights and the importance of the Supreme Court. "A woman physician has never served in the U.S. Senate before -- ever," she wrote 
in a recent op-ed
 touting her science background. Republicans, however, think a national environment that looks worse for Biden could help them hold onto this seat, especially with the biggest fundraiser in the race pushing the party to the left on some issues. "Stop apologizing for the space we take up as a party and ram some stuff through and get it done," Pennsylvania Lt. Gov. John Fetterman
 told CNN
 in a recent interview about his strong belief in eliminating the filibuster. That's just what Republicans want to hear as they look to attack him as too extreme for this purple state. Still, Democrats have the edge in a state that Biden carried in 2020.
2. Georgia
Incumbent: Democrat Raphael Warnock
Former football star Herschel Walker, the man who was freezing the Republican field in Georgia for months, finally launched his Senate campaign late last month, which was quickly followed by an unsurprising 
Trump endorsement
. The former President is holding a rally in the Peach State this weekend, where he's sure to share his thoughts on candidates up and down the ballot there as he seeks revenge on Republicans whom he thinks were insufficiently supportive of his efforts to overturn the 2020 election. Agriculture Commissioner Gary Black, who's tried to attack Walker, is still running for the GOP nomination, as are a handful of others. It remains to be seen how much establishment Republicans worried about Walker's candidacy can do about it now that he's in the race with Trump's backing. But Sen. Raphael Warnock, who's running for a full six-year term, is glad to have the Democratic field to himself as he raises money for what's sure to be a hotly competitive general election race, regardless of how the GOP primary shakes out. After winning the presidential contest here, as well as two Senate runoffs that flipped the balance of the chamber, Democrats are hopeful that a competitive governor's race -- and especially a potential Stacey Abrams candidacy -- will help juice turnout in a non-presidential election year.   
3. Wisconsin
Incumbent: Republican Ron Johnson
It's the question that no one seems to know the answer to -- except, maybe, the senior senator from Wisconsin himself: Is 
Ron Johnson
 running for a third term? At this point, given his penchant for saying controversial things about the 2020 election, the January 6 insurrection, the coronavirus and vaccines, Democrats seem to be just as happy running against the two-term Republican as they would be if he retired and this were an open seat. Only 35% of Wisconsin voters viewed Johnson favorably in a 
Marquette University Law School poll
 from mid-August, while 42% viewed him unfavorably. But his lowest net favorability was in November 2015, the year before he came from behind to win a second term. Republicans point to that 2016 election to argue that Johnson, who previously promised to serve only two terms, has been discounted before. While ambitious Republicans wait in the wings to see what Johnson will do, Democrats have a very crowded field. Lt. Gov. Mandela Barnes recently picked up a high-profile progressive endorsement in Massachusetts Sen. Elizabeth Warren. 
4. Arizona
Incumbent: Democrat Mark Kelly
Nearly a year after Biden won Arizona and Democrat Mark Kelly unseated GOP Sen. Martha McSally, Republicans are still litigating the 2020 election here. Attorney General Mark Brnovich had earned Trump's ire for not doing enough to audit the state's election results, despite there being no evidence of fraud. "Hopefully he's going to do what everybody knows has to be done," Trump said of the attorney general at a late June rally in the state. Since then, Brnovich has leaned into the partisan review pushed by the GOP-led state Senate, 
threatening to withhold funds
 from Maricopa County because he alleged the county's supervisors did not fully respond to a subpoena for the so-called audit. And earlier this month, Brnovich announced 
the state is suing
 the Biden administration for "federal overreach" over the President's vaccine mandates. Meanwhile, a super PAC supporting Blake Masters, the president of the Thiel Foundation, went up with an
 ad
 earlier this month hitting Brnovich for "saying President Trump is wrong on voter fraud" and "making excuses instead of standing with our president." Democrats are happy to have Republicans attacking each other -- and pushing each other to the right -- as Kelly wracks up money. They're hoping that 2020 election denialism, while perhaps an important litmus test in the GOP primary, will be unpalatable to general election voters next November. Republicans, however, contend that issues like immigration will be of far greater importance next fall, which is why they've been attacking Kelly on the border and trying to use fellow Democratic Sen. Kyrsten Sinema as a moderate foil to make him look too liberal. 
5. North Carolina
Incumbent: Republican Richard Burr (retiring)
Trump endorsed in the GOP primary to replace retiring Sen. Richard Burr back in June, throwing his support behind Rep. Ted Budd in a surprise announcement in front of other contenders. But former Gov. Pat McCrory and former Rep. Mark Walker aren't backing down. Meanwhile, the political arm of the Conservative Club for Growth, which has stood by Budd since helping him emerge from a 17-way House primary in 2016, is 
taking the airwaves
 to attack McCrory, arguing that he cannot win because he lost reelection in 2016 when Trump won the state. Walker has tried to make a similar argument about McCrory, while both he and McCrory have piled on Budd. Trump carried the Tar Heel State by just over a point in 2020, making this potentially competitive terrain even if Republicans start with the early advantage. State Sen. Jeff Jackson, who's been in the race since January, had raised the most money on the Democratic side by the end of the second quarter. But former state Supreme Court Chief Justice Cheri Beasley, who joined the race in late April, raised $1.3 million during the second quarter. Besides EMILY's List, she has the backing of Higher Heights PAC, which works to elect progressive Black women, and the political arm of the Congressional Black Caucus, reflecting the enthusiasm for a non-White male candidate helping turn out minority voters in a non-presidential year, especially in some of the rural areas where Republicans have continued to hold an advantage.
6. New Hampshire
Incumbent: Democrat Maggie Hassan
As Republicans grow more excited about Gov. Chris Sununu possibly running for Senate, Democrats are finding more reasons to argue that electing a Republican at the federal level in New Hampshire isn't the same as electing one to serve in Concord. They're largely turning to abortion to make that case, highlighting a budget the governor signed that included abortion restrictions and the Executive Council's recent vote to defund Planned Parenthood and family planning providers. (Sununu does not have a vote on the council and 
called the vote
 "incredibly disappointing" in a statement.) Despite the state trending blue at the federal level, Republicans are convinced that first-term Sen. Maggie Hassan is highly vulnerable, and both sides admit this race isn't likely to look like 2020, when Sen. Jeanne Shaheen won reelection by nearly 16 points. But Sununu keeps pushing back his timeline for making a decision about running, so, for now, Hassan has the race largely to herself. She released 
her first TV ad
 earlier this month -- a positive spot that touches on her father's service in World War II and her own work for veterans. Even if the governor doesn't run, however, Hassan could have a strong challenger in former Sen. Kelly Ayotte, whom the Democrat beat by just over 1,000 votes in 2016.
7. Nevada
Incumbent: Democrat Catherine Cortez Masto
Democratic Sen. Catherine Cortez Masto finally has a high-profile opponent in 
former Nevada Attorney General Adam Laxalt
, whom national Republicans had long eyed as the top challenger but who officially launched his campaign at the end of August. He's the rare GOP candidate who was 
recruited by Senate Minority Leader Mitch McConnell 
and has Trump's endorsement, making it more likely he'll have the GOP field mostly to himself as other ambitious Republicans jockey for the gubernatorial nomination. As Tump's campaign co-chair in the Silver State, Laxalt followed the former President's lead on false charges of voter fraud, for which Trump praised him in offering his endorsement last month, and he's already 
made some noise
 about filing lawsuits in 2022. Democrats are hoping his embrace of Trump's election fraud narrative will help tie him to the former President and turn off voters in a state that Biden carried last fall. His position on abortion could be also be litigated in the general election, especially since Nevada has a history of GOP leaders who have been more supportive of abortion rights, like former GOP Gov. Brian Sandoval. Democrats hope to argue that Laxalt is out of touch with voters on the issue. Still, Biden only carried the Silver State by just over 2 points, and Cortez Masto is running for her first reelection, so Democrats aren't taking anything for granted here, especially with an uncertain post-pandemic electorate. 
8. Florida
Incumbent: Republican Marco Rubio
GOP Sen. Marco Rubio starts with the advantage in this state that Trump carried by 3 points last year. But Democratic Rep. Val Demings, who outraised Rubio in the second quarter, is proving to be a strong fundraiser who could give the Republican senator a real race. Rubio is trying to 
tie Demings to "the socialist squad"
 and Democrats' physical and human infrastructure bills. (Rubio 
voted against
 the bipartisan $1 trillion infrastructure bill in the Senate last month.) Demings has 
attacked Rubio
 for traveling to Iowa late last month while Florida is dealing with the Delta variant surge.  
9. Ohio
Incumbent: Republican Rob Portman (retiring)
GOP Sen. Rob Portman's decision to retire has opened up a crowded GOP primary, with most contenders trying to "outTrump" each other in a state the former President won by 8 points. State Sen. Matt Dolan, who entered the race this week, cuts a more moderate profile. He supports the bipartisan infrastructure bill that Portman negotiated, according to an interview with 
Cleveland.com
, and has been 
critical
 of Trump's election lies. But it's unclear how much traction he can get in a GOP primary where the former President's influence is king with the base. Trump already attacked Dolan, whose family owns Cleveland's baseball team, for "cancel culture" because they 
decided to change
 the team's name. Former state treasurer Josh Mandel has been courting that conservative base hard, 
attacking refugees
 despite his own family history. JD Vance, the author of "Hillbilly Elegy," has been leading in earned media attention and is wracking up endorsements from conservative leaders like Missouri Sen. Josh Hawley and Indiana Rep. Jim Banks, the chair of the largest conservative caucus in the House. Those endorsements could help compensate for his prior criticism of Trump, which his opponents are eager to use against him. Former state party chair Jane Timken, businessmen Mike Gibbons and Bernie Moreno are also running. On the Democratic side, Rep. Tim Ryan recently got a challenge from his left in Morgan Harper, who's 
arguing
 that she can drive the minority turnout needed to turn Ohio blue. Harper lost a 2020 primary challenge to Rep. Joyce Beatty, who's now the chair of the Congressional Black Caucus and has backed Ryan.
10. Missouri
Incumbent: Republican Roy Blunt (retiring)
Missouri continues to occupy the 10th spot on this list because of the chance that the Republican nominee to replace retiring Sen. Roy Blunt will give Democrats an opening. But it would be a massively uphill climb for Democrats to flip this seat blue in a state that Trump won by 15 points. Their best hope is former Gov. Eric Greitens, who resigned from office following a probe into allegations of sexual and campaign misconduct, winning the GOP nomination and creating a Todd Akin situation. The 2012 Senate nominee's "legitimate rape" comments cost Republicans the Missouri Senate seat and imperiled GOP nominees across the country. Greitens, who has been picking up endorsements from Trump world -- recently former national security adviser Michael Flynn, for example -- hardly has the field to himself. Attorney General Eric Schmitt is running, with his super PAC allies leaning into his suit against mask mandates in schools to tout his candidacy. Reps. Billy Long and Vicky Hartzler are also running, as is Mark McCloskey, whom the Republican governor 
pardoned
 last month after he and his wife had pleaded guilty to misdemeanor charges for pointing guns at protesters near their home last summer. While GOP voters will have plenty of candidates to choose from, more candidates means a more splintered vote, which could lower the threshold it takes for Greitens to win the nomination. 
White House press secretary Jen Psaki told reporters Friday afternoon that President Joe Biden declined to assert privilege over documents pertaining to
 former President Donald Trump's 
administration sought by the January 6 select committee. During the White House press briefing, Psaki said that "the President has determined that an assertion of executive privilege is not warranted for the first set of documents from the Trump White House that have been provided to us by the National Archives."
"As we've said previously, this will be an ongoing process and this is just the first set of documents," she said. "And we will evaluate questions of privilege on a case-by-case basis, but the President has also been clear that he believes it to be of the utmost importance for both Congress and the American people to have a complete understanding of the events of that day to prevent them from happening again."
The National Archives has already identified documents in response to the committee request and shared them with the Trump legal team and the White House, according to a source familiar with the matter. 
NBC was first to report 
on the White House's decision.
The Archives did not immediately respond to CNN's request for comment and has previously said it considers the process as outlined by the Presidential Records Act to be "deliberative until a final decision is made."
"The documents are Trump-era White House records responsive to the select committee's request to the archivist. And so, there is a process where the former President would have a period of time to assess executive privilege and then the current President and team would have a period of time to review that request," Psaki said during Friday's White House press briefing.
Psaki would not say what the form of documents were, such as phone records or visitors' logs.
In a letter to the David Ferriero, the archivist of the United States, White House counsel Dana Remus writes that the decision to not assert executive privilege applies to an initial tranche of documents that were provided to the White House and Trump's attorneys in September. Remus writes that there are other documents the National Archives has provided to the White House for review and a decision about invoking executive privilege on those documents has not yet been made.
Remus wrote in the letter that the request comes amid "unique and extraordinary circumstances."
"Congress is examining an assault on our Constitution and democratic institutions provoked and fanned by those sworn to protect them, and the conduct under investigation extends far beyond typical deliberations concerning the proper discharge of the President's constitutional responsibilities," Remus wrote. "The constitutional protections of executive privilege should not be used to shield, from Congress or the public, information that reflects a clear and apparent effort to subvert the Constitution itself."
The letter concluded: "We understand that the former President believes that executive privilege should be asserted with respect to a subset of the Documents. When you notify us of such an assertion, we will respond accordingly."
Trump also sent a letter to the National Archives on Friday, arguing that approximately 40 of the documents initially requested by the committee are subject to executive privilege -- a claim that conflicts with Biden's determination.
"I hereby formally assert executive privilege over these records," Trump wrote, noting that the committee has requested "an extremely broad set of documents and records, potentially numbering in the millions" that he believes contain information either protected by executive privilege or others, like attorney-client privilege.
"Should the committee persist in seeking other privileged information, I will take all necessary and appropriate steps to defend the Office of the Presidency," Trump added. 
The National Archives and Records Administration told CNN it was in receipt of both letters but declined to comment further.
Legal experts say Biden has the ultimate say over whether these documents are covered by executive privilege, and considering the committee is led by members of Biden's party, Trump's power to sway the outcome is an open question, something Psaki acknowledged on Friday.  
"The process is one that has been outlined through history ... the former President has the ability -- not that there is a lot of past precedent here -- I will acknowledge, has the opportunity to exert executive privilege to documents that are in the National Archives. And then this President and this White House has the opportunity to review that," Psaki said.
The House select committee has launched a sweeping investigation into January 6. As part of that, the panel has sent requests for information to a number of federal agencies, including the National Archives, the custodian of the Trump administration White House records.
The committee asked for "all documents and communications within the White House" on that day, including call logs, schedules and meetings with top officials and outside advisers, including Rudy Giuliani.
The White House indicated last month that Biden did not expect to assert executive privilege to shield those records from being seen by the committee.
"We take this matter incredibly seriously," Psaki said during a press briefing on September 24. "The President has already concluded that it would not be appropriate to assert executive privilege."
Psaki noted Friday that "the first set of documents (was) reviewed on a case-by-case basis" but underscored that what the January 6 committee is investigating "is not the normal course of government business."
In August, Trump threatened to invoke executive privilege in an effort to block the House select committee from obtaining the massive tranche of documents it has demanded from several US government agencies, despite his successor having the ultimate say over whether the information can be shared.
To date, the former President has not been as aggressive legally in trying to assert that privilege as his public statements might suggest and the White House's announcement Friday indicates he will likely have trouble preventing the initial batch of documents from being released to the committee.
That said, Trump can still attempt to protect his records by suing relevant agencies -- assuming he can pull together enough legal firepower for a pricey and complex court battle. 
If Trump files a lawsuit, that could, at very least, slow down the process of handing over the documents, but the former President only has a limited amount of time to take that step, according to Deborah Pearlstein, a constitutional law professor at Cardozo Law School and expert on presidential powers. 
"If the sitting president has said he's not going to assert privilege, then there's a certain amount of time (before) the documents then have to be released unless the former President succeeds in getting a court order, an injunction, for example, prohibiting their release," she told CNN. "That would require a pretty significant ruling by a federal court."
"It's not impossible but all of this is now under a ticking clock," she added, noting we could see activity "if the former president and his team are aggressive legally, sooner rather than later." 
This story has been updated with additional reporting and reaction.
A version of this story first appeared in CNN Business' Before the Bell newsletter. Not a subscriber? You can sign up 
right here
.
Breaking it down: NFTs transform digital works of art and other collectibles into one-of-a-kind, verifiable assets that are easy to trade on the blockchain. Notable examples include a decade-old "Nyan Cat" GIF, which sold for $600,000, and Twitter CEO Jack Dorsey's first tweet, which 
hauled in $2.9 million
.
Then the 
fervor subsided
, and it looked like what some were calling a speculative bubble had popped. But last month, interest in NFTs surged again Fans tout bitcoin as the future of money and a hedge against inflation since it's not tied to government printing presses like the dollar, euro, yen and yuan. But if you're a crypto novice, you might be wondering what all the fuss is about "Executive privilege will be defended, not just on behalf of my Administration and the Patriots who worked beside me, but on behalf of the Office of the President of the United States and the future of our Nation," Trump said in a statement, without detailing how such an effort would be conducted.
The Biden administration has already declined to assert executive privilege over some testimony related to January 6, 
telling
 former Justice Department officials that they were free to provide "unrestricted testimony." But the administration has not weighed in on whether the committee should have unrestricted access to records and documents from the Trump White House.
The document requests from the House select committee echo those previously issued by other House committees in the aftermath of the January 6 riot, while significantly broadening the search to other areas and people inside and outside government. Specifically, the select committee is asking for records from the Department of Justice, Department of the Interior, Department of Defense, the Office of the Director of National Intelligence, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the National Counterterrorism Center, the Department of Homeland Security and, perhaps most importantly, the National Archives -- the custodian of the Trump administration White House records.
The list of targets is long and varied, ranging from information about attempts to either carry out or defy Trump's orders, invoke the insurrection act, martial law or the 25th Amendment, as well as for communications regarding members of the Trump White House, campaign, January 5 and January 6 rally organizers, and even alleged members of far-right extremist groups such as the Proud Boys and the Oath Keepers.
"The Select Committee to Investigate the January 6th Attack on the United States Capitol is examining the facts, circumstances, and causes of the January 6th attack. Our Constitution provides for a peaceful transfer of power, and this investigation seeks to evaluate threats to that process, identify lessons learned and recommend laws, policies, procedures, rules, or regulations necessary to protect our republic in the future," 
committee Chairman Rep. Bennie Thompson
, a Democrat from Mississippi, wrote in a statement Wednesday.
That message was echoed by Democratic Rep. Zoe Lofgren of California, another member of the committee, who told CNN's Kate Bolduan on "OutFront" Wednesday evening that "this is just the beginning."
"We are trying to find out what happened leading up to January 6, the various elements, the reasoning, who instigated it, why they instigated it and the like. We want to find out every element of it, and so we've made this request and this is, as I said, just the beginning. There are many other requests for documents that we will be making," Lofgren said. 
"Some of these requests were made to these agencies by other committees in Congress earlier and they have not been responded to. So we need the information now and we've made that clear to the various federal agencies."
Several of the letters request "all documents and communications" related in any way to Trump and members of his family who served in official roles at the White House, including: former First Lady Melania Trump and top advisers Ivanka Trump and Jared Kushner. 
Some of the former President's other children and their spouses, Donald Trump Jr., Eric Trump and Lara Trump, are named as well. 
The committee is also seeking records related to then-Vice President Mike Pence and a host of former White House officials, including former Chief of Staff Mark Meadows, as well as of the former President, who have questioned the validity of election results in key states where Trump lost. 
Among those listed are Rudy Giuliani, Michael Flynn, Steve Bannon and Roger Stone. 
Investigators focused on efforts to overturn 2020 election results
As part of the sweeping records request, the committee has asked the Department of Justice for documents and communications involving discussions about challenging the validity of the election between Trump and former top DOJ officials, such as Jeffrey Rosen, Richard Donoghue, Patrick Hovakimian, Byung J."BJay" Pak, Bobby Christine and Jeffrey Clark.
The committee also requested communications between Trump or his allies and "any DOJ official" in the days before and after January 6. As part of that request, the committee asked for any documentation related to discussion of the 25th Amendment from November 3, 2020, to January 20, 2021.
CNN previously reported that Clark, a Trump-appointed environment law chief for DOJ, was at the center of the former President's efforts to overturn the election, received a high-level intelligence briefing around New Year's 2021 that did little to stop his efforts to prove foreign interference had cost Trump reelection.
He has emerged as a major figure in the narrative being written in documents and testimony from former Justice Department officials who were forced to fight off his efforts to orchestrate a coup of leadership at the Justice Department and use it to help the former President.
Clark isn't scheduled yet for an interview with the House Select Committee. A source familiar with Clark's thinking 
told CNN earlier this month 
he is awaiting access to documents the committee has and to see whether a fight over the secrecy of presidential discussions materializes. 
In addition, the committee requested all documents and communications from individuals that could show DOJ intervention in litigation filed by the Trump campaign -- or states seeking to challenge the election.
On that list are Meadows as well as Trump lawyers and advisers, including Giuliani, Kurt Olsen, Sidney Powell, Jenna Ellis, Joseph diGenova, and Victoria Toensing.
The committee also asked the Justice Department to provide documents that pertain to the certification of the election, including the role that Pence played in presiding over the Senate the day election results were certified.  
And the committee asked about any senior personnel changes at the Justice Department, including with presidential appointees, between November 3, 2020, and January 20, 2021.
The committee specifically requested all documentation pertaining to Clark, a former Trump appointee at the DOJ who has emerged as central to Trump's efforts to overturn the election. The committee also requested communication between then-Attorney General William Barr and attorneys investigating allegations of voter fraud. 
Targeting efforts to overturn the election results from within the White House, the committee is seeking records from the National Archives including all communication between White House officials and state government officials from hotly contested states such as Arizona, Georgia, Texas and Michigan.
The officials include Arizona Gov. Doug Ducey, Georgia Gov. Brian Kemp, Georgia Secretary of State Brad Raffensperger, chief investigator for Georgia Secretary of State Frances Watson, Texas Attorney General Ken Paxton, Michigan state Senate Majority Leader Mike Shirkey, former Michigan Speaker of the House Lee Chatfield, and Wayne County Board of Canvassers Chairwoman Monica Palmer. 
The panel is also demanding all communication related to Dominion Voting Systems Corp., which was the system used that became a primary target of voter fraud falsehoods. 
Committee seeks internal White House communications
In its request to the National Archives, which houses all of Trump's records from his time as president, the select committee zeroes in on the paper trail it wants to obtain from the former President and his orbit. 
Based on how the panel's request is divided, it appears focused on examining whether the White House worked to delay or impede the counting of election results, what Trump knew about the election outcome versus what he stated publicly, the planning and recruitment around the January 6 rally, and if there were efforts to stop the peaceful transfer of power.
The list surrounding Trump includes requests for call logs, telephone records, schedules and meetings for an expansive group including the Trump children -- Ivanka, Eric and Donald Jr. -- as well as Lara Trump, Jared Kushner, Melania Trump, Flynn, Stone, Giuliani, Stephen Miller, Marc Short, Hope Hicks and Kayleigh McEnany.
Although the list does not name any members of Congress, the committee requests documentation on "any Member of Congress or congressional staff" who fits into this category of officials who were influential in maneuvering Trump's handling of the events of January 6.
From the day of January 6 specifically, the committee requests all White House visitor logs, notations on movements of Trump and communications from the Situation Room. 
In terms of the security breakdowns related to January 6, the committee also asked the Justice Department for all documents related to its planning as well as decision making on when to deploy law enforcement personnel to the Capitol and discussion about the use of martial law.
The committee goes as far as requesting all documents pertaining to "the mental stability" of Trump or "his fitness for office" in the days between the insurrection and when he left office on January 20.
Will Biden assert privilege? 
The National Archives previously told CNN it possesses documents that are relevant to the committee's investigation and that there is a process "by which the Congress and the incumbent administration may request access to records of former administrations."
The committee's document requests could lead to potentially lengthy fights over access.
President Joe Biden could seek to block the committee from receiving any of the documents by asserting executive privilege. 
And Trump could still try to go to court to stop the committee from obtaining documents from the Trump White House and testimony from people like former White House Chief of Staff Meadows.
The question of executive privilege poses several potentially uncomfortable political scenarios for Biden.
If he does assert privilege, the Democrat-led committee could pursue more extreme legal avenues to try to obtain the records. If he doesn't, that could set a precedent that opens his administration to expansive, Republican-led probes if the GOP wins either chamber in the midterm elections.
CNN reported
 earlier this week that congressional investigators are also poised to send notices to various telecommunications companies requesting that they preserve the phone records of several people, including members of Congress. 
Rep. Thompson a Mississippi Democrat, said the panel plans to send notices to social media companies, too, though he declined to name which ones.
"I can tell you that we'll look at everything that will give us information on what happened on January 6," Thompson said. "We will look at all records at some point."
This story has been updated with additional developments Wednesday.
During Tuesday's 
House select committee hearing
 on January 6, we got fresh details and first-hand accounts from four police officers who came face to face with rioters and the weapons they brought, once again debunking this false narrative. 
Republican Rep. Adam Kinzinger of Illinois, 
one of two Republicans
 Speaker Nancy Pelosi chose to serve on the committee, 
ridiculed
 the idea that January 6 "was not an armed insurrection" and asked the four officers testifying to respond to that claim. 
In February, GOP Sen. Ron Johnson of Wisconsin made waves for questioning whether the events of January 6 were really as violent as they appeared and suggested it wasn't an armed insurrection. And in May, Rep. Louie Gohmert of Texas 
claimed
 there was no evidence the riot was an "armed insurrection," adding that "Not one person has been charged with bringing a firearm to the Capitol."
As Kinzinger noted during the hearing, all of these claims are inaccurate.
Facts First:
 
While it's impossible to know precisely how many firearms were brought to the Capitol on January 6, it's already clear that at least some of the people present were carrying guns that day. And as the police officers who testified at the committee on Tuesday made clear, rioters also used numerous other objects as weapons such as knives and bats. 
 
Weapons used 
US Capitol Police Sgt. Aquilino Gonell told Kinzinger that "(c)ommon things were used as weapons, like a baseball bat, a hockey stick, a rebar, a flagpole -- including the American flag -- pepper spray, bear spray."
The rioters "had all these items," Gonell said, "used to attack us. Those are weapons." 
As CNN has 
reported
, rioters also used knives, stolen police shields, a stun gun, fire extinguisher and more. Hand-to-hand combat led to more than a dozen officers being sent to the hospital, some of whom had bone fractures and concussions. 
Firearms 
So far, with the investigation still ongoing, three individuals have been charged for allegedly bringing a gun onto Capitol grounds on January 6. At least two other individuals have also been charged with gun crimes in relation to the events of that day, though they are not accused of carrying on Capitol grounds.
According to police 
testimony
, Christopher Alberts was arrested leaving the Capitol grounds on January 6 while trying to flee from officers after they suspected he was carrying a firearm on his hip. Alberts was carrying a loaded pistol and 25 rounds of ammunition, 
according
 to court documents. 
Guy Reffitt has been 
charged
 with illegally bringing a handgun on Capitol grounds on January 6. Reffitt allegedly told family members he "brought his gun with him" in the Capitol attack.  
Mark Ibrahim, who at the time was an off-duty special agent for the Drug Enforcement Administration, has been 
charged
 with bringing his service weapon on Capitol grounds during the insurrection as well as lying to the FBI about why he was at the Capitol.   
Another individual, Cleveland Meredith Jr., is 
accused
 of possessing a pistol and rifle without "a registration for any firearm in Washington, DC," which were recovered by the FBI a day after the insurrection. According to an officer statement, the individual arrived too late for the Capitol riot and talked about killing Pelosi in a text conversation. 
Yet another person, Lonnie Coffman, is 
accused
 of parking a truck filled with 11 homemade bombs, a handgun and an assault rifle two blocks away from the Capitol for several hours on January 6. Most of these defendants have pleaded not guilty or say they'll fight the charges. 
Federal prosecutors have also 
said
 members of the Oath Keepers, a paramilitary group, likely stored weapons at a hotel in Arlington, Virginia, as part of their plan to have an armed rapid-response force during the January 6 insurrection.
During Tuesday's hearing, DC Metropolitan Police Officer Daniel Hodges noted that the situation during the riot made it difficult to confirm reports of firearms and conduct arrests accordingly on January 6 itself. Hodges said the gun recovery unit was "working the crowd to try and confirm reports of firearms on certain people but it's also difficult to do given the nature of the crowd and how many there were."
The revelations not only add to a growing concerns about intelligence gathering, but they also raise questions about a key staffer on the committee investigating the insurrection and his previous role in determining how threat information that came from public sources, was shared with law enforcement prior to the Capitol attack.
Joseph Maher, who changed the protocols around disseminating open-source information as head of DHS' intelligence arm, is now on the staff of 
the House Select Committee on January 6. 
That committee has a broad mandate that includes examining why authorities were caught so off-guard by the violence that unfolded at the Capitol -- especially considering law enforcement was aware but ultimately chose not to act on a significant number of warning signs on social media and elsewhere in the public sphere.
In a memo dated October 30, 2020, Maher informed DHS officials that all open-source intelligence reports on election-related threats must be approved by DHS leadership and legal counsel prior to release, according to the documents, which were provided to CNN by the Citizens for Responsibility and Ethics in Washington.    
"Because of the very real concerns about apparent failures to disseminate and act on intelligence in the leadup to the January 6 insurrection, this memo raises important questions about the intent behind the change, the origins of it, and the effect this policy change had on intelligence dissemination," said Noah Bookbinder, president of CREW watchdog group. "The January 6 select committee should consider these questions."
Maher did not respond to a request for comment. The select committee has defended Maher in response to criticism about his handling of intelligence related to domestic extremists while at DHS. But when asked about the October memo, a spokesperson for the bipartisan panel, Tim Mulvey, told CNN that Maher is "recused from any Select Committee matters dealing with DHS" in light of his prior service at DHS and committee policy.
"All members of the Select Committee staff are required to identify areas where a potential personal or organizational conflict of interest may exist, and staff leadership is taking affirmative steps to screen for such conflicts. Any staff member deemed or determined to have an actual conflict or the appearance of a conflict will disclose and recuse themselves from such matters," he said in a statement. 
Maher's October memo also reveals new details on how DHS balanced free speech and the increasingly violent rhetoric surrounding the presidential election last year.
Maher noted that there would likely be an increase in open-source intel reports on these issues, and that he was not imposing limits on collecting the intel. But he said such reports would need to go through a "pre-release review."
"We anticipate that the period leading up to, including, and immediately following the presidential election on 3 November may give rise to physical violence, civil unrest, and other threats related to the election," Maher wrote. 
"At the same time, we recognize that this mission space carries sensitivities and complexities that are not always anticipated or that do not lend themselves to bright line advance guidance," he added. "Civil unrest and election- or voter-related issues often invoke U.S. Persons and First Amendment-protected activity."
As a result, Maher "created additional levels of review before intelligence reports about election-related civil unrest could be sent out to other parts of the government," according to Bookbinder.
Since his hiring was announced by the select committee earlier this year, critics have questioned how Maher can objectively help investigate failures around the dissemination of intelligence on election-related threats and domestic extremists considering they occurred under his leadership.
While the October memo provides one of the first concrete examples of how Maher changed department policy in his previous role at DHS, the specific impact of this shift remains unclear.
Intelligence sharing breakdowns
Law enforcement officials who have testified about the security failures around January 6 have pointed the finger at DHS, along with other agencies, as they described the intelligence sharing breakdowns that took place prior to the attack.
In February, former US Capitol Police Chief Steven Sund alleged that the FBI, US Secret Service, Department of Homeland Security and the DC Metropolitan Police Department failed to anticipate violence on that day, though he said it was reasonable to rely on that intelligence since earlier pro-Trump rallies had been similarly assessed and ended up not being violent.
"The entire intelligence community seems to have missed this," he wrote.
On January 3, an assessment of the upcoming protests indicated it was "expected to be similar to the previous Million MAGA March rallies in November and December 2020, which drew tens of thousands of participants," Sund wrote in his letter to House Speaker Nancy Pelosi. The assessment indicated that the far-right Proud Boys and far-left Antifa groups were expected at the Capitol on the January 6 and "may be inclined to become violent."
A day later, the US Capitol Police's daily intelligence report assessed the risk of violence at these events as either "remote" or "improbable," according to Sund's letter. That day's report noted "the Secretary of Homeland Security has not issued an elevated or imminent alert at this time."
CNN previously reported that the DHS intelligence division did not issue a specific warning about the possibility of violence on January 6, according to two DHS officials, but did author and disseminate several assessments highlighting potential threats surrounding election season.
A bipartisan Senate report examining security failures around January 6 also stated that DHS Office of Intelligence and Analysis, which Maher led in the months leading up to the attack, "never produced an intelligence product, bulletin, or warning specific to the January 6 Joint Session of Congress."
"One I&A official informed the Committees that he was 'not aware of any known direct threat to the Capitol before January 6,' despite many online posts mentioning violence," the report adds. "In briefings with the committees, I&A officials highlighted the difficulty in discerning credible threats from online bravado and constitutionally protected speech, which limits its collection capabilities."
In March, Maher's successor, DHS acting intelligence chief Melissa Smislova acknowledged that "more should have been done" to understand the threat of violence ahead of the US Capitol attack, pointing to "concerning information" that was evaluated in the weeks prior.
Maher's role on the committee
That breakdown is well within the scope of the select committee's investigation.
Earlier this month, the committee demanded that DHS hand over "all documents and communications pertaining to rules, regulations, procedures, or policies that restrict monitoring or reporting related to First Amendment protected activities."
It also requested
 "all documents and communications pertaining to agency review, collection, or dissemination of social media evidence in the 6 months prior to January 6, 2021, relating to events that could or ultimately did transpire on January 6, 2021."
While it remains unclear if the October memo was included in the initial batch of documents DHS says it delivered to the committee last week, its relevance to the probe has fueled questions about Maher's role on the panel's staff considering he was in charge of DHS' intelligence arm for several months until late January.
"Maher was in charge. So how can he be a staffer on the Committee investigating whether I&A failed in its job?" asked Mark Zaid, an attorney 
representing DHS whistleblower Brian Murphy, 
who served in the same role at DHS until summer 2020. Separately, Murphy has alleged Maher was among the officials who retaliated against him, leading to his demotion.
A source close to the select committee probe also told CNN that Maher's hiring created "bad optics," and that his previous role at DHS could result in questions about conflicts of interest as the investigation progresses.
DHS intelligence office under scrutiny 
Maher, who at the time was DHS' principal deputy general counsel, was installed last summer to lead the intelligence office amid a First Amendment controversy and management shakeup. 
As the department surged personnel to Portland, Oregon, to assist with the sometimes-violent protests for racial justice and police accountability, 
a report was published 
detailing how the Office of Intelligence and Analysis had compiled intelligence reports about the work of two US journalists covering the protests.
The revelation prompted public backlash and Murphy's dismissal. After that report, acting Homeland Security Secretary Chad Wolf also directed the intelligence branch to cease collecting information on US members of the media and ordered a review of the incident. Wolf later told lawmakers that there were three instances of information being distributed as part of the DHS "Open Source Reporting Program" that identified members of the press.
Murphy would later file a whistleblower complaint alleging top political appointees in the Department of Homeland Security repeatedly instructed career officials to modify intelligence assessments to suit President Donald Trump's agenda by downplaying the threat posed by White supremacists, as CNN first reported last year.
The select committee has defended Maher in response to criticism about his handling of intelligence related to domestic extremists while at DHS but declined to comment on the whistleblower retaliation allegations levied by Murphy, noting an inspector general investigation in that case is still ongoing.
"The Select Committee has no reason to believe that Mr. Maher is the focus of this probe and it would be inappropriate for the Select Committee to comment on an ongoing IG review," the committee spokesperson told CNN. "Mr. Maher believes that any allegations implicating him are entirely baseless, that he did not retaliate in any way against anyone."
The Presidential Commission on the Supreme Court of the United States was established in April partly as a compromise with liberals, who called for the expansion of the number of justices on the conservative-dominated Supreme Court -- dubbed "court packing" by critics.
Biden brought up the idea of creating the commission while campaigning for president, as he was being pressured by fellow Democrats to take a stand on court expansion to try to bring greater balance to a bench dominated 6-3 by conservatives. The court appears poised to continue its right turn on abortion rights, religious liberty and voting restrictions.
But according to the White House, the commission is examining far more than just expanding the bench. 
White House press secretary Jen Psaki announced the upcoming release of the commission's "draft preliminary discussion materials" during Wednesday's press briefing, telling reporters the materials have not been submitted to the White House for edits or feedback. She added that the materials' release will be followed by a public meeting of the commission on Friday.
"Our objective here is to allow this process, made up of a diverse range of experts and voices, to move forward and represent different viewpoints and we're not going to comment on it -- or the President wouldn't comment on it -- until a report is final and he has the chance to review it at that period of time," Psaki said. 
A final report will be submitted to Biden in mid-November.
The White House has previously said that "the commission's purpose is to provide an analysis of the principal arguments in the contemporary public debate for and against Supreme Court reform, including an appraisal of the merits and legality of particular reform proposals," adding that commissioners would examine such options as term limits for justices; changing the size of the court; and altering its case selection, rules and practices.
The commission
 is not expected to make final recommendations for reform.
Many Democrats also 
remain incensed 
that Senate Republicans blocked the 2016 Supreme Court nomination of then-US Appeals Court Judge Merrick Garland for nearly a year, but then moved swiftly to confirm President Donald Trump's appointees, including Amy Coney Barrett just days before the November 2020 presidential election.
Biden 
signaled
 on the campaign trail that he's "not a fan" of court packing. 
While discussing his idea to form a commission, Biden 
told CBS News 
last fall that he wanted "recommendations as to how to reform the court system because it's getting out of whack."
"It's not about court-packing," he said. "There's a number of other things that our constitutional scholars have debated. ... The last thing we need to do is turn the Supreme Court into just a political football, whoever has the most votes gets whatever they want. Presidents come and go. Supreme Court justices stay for generations."
The move comes as liberals are calling for additional seats to balance out the conservative-dominated bench that is increasingly going to the right on 
abortion
, 
immigration
, 
voting rights
 and 
religious freedom
 cases. 
Biden first proposed a presidential commission as a candidate last October, partly as an alternative to immediate "court packing" demands from Democrats, as proposals for more seats on the nine-member bench are dubbed. Another idea that scholars have raised in recent years, and could be under consideration, is term limits for the justices, who currently enjoy life tenure.   
Liberals pressing for dramatic change are trying to generate a sense of urgency by emphasizing just how different the high court is today. Trump appointments have 
accelerated the rightward tilt 
of judges across the county, and the Supreme Court is now controlled by the 6-3 conservative majority since the addition of Justice Amy Coney Barrett for the late 
Ruth Bader Ginsburg
. 
Democrats remain incensed that Senate Republicans blocked the 2016 Supreme Court nomination of US Appeals Court Judge Merrick Garland for nearly a year, but then moved swiftly to confirm President Donald Trump's appointees, including Barrett just days before the November 2020 presidential election. 
"Democrats feel that seats were stolen from them, and that now their priorities will be struck down by the court," said University of Wisconsin law professor Joshua Braver, who has studied the history and consequences of "court packing."  
Officials involved with the Biden commission say its membership and mission are being finalized and could be unveiled as early as next week. 
The co-chairs will be Bob Bauer, a former White House counsel to President Barack Obama and currently a New York University law professor, and Cristina Rodriguez, a Yale law professor who early in her career was a law clerk to former Supreme Court Justice Sandra Day O'Connor. 
The full membership slate is not yet known, but it appears Biden, a Democrat, may fulfill his vow to appoint both Democrats and Republicans, liberals and conservatives. Many members are law professors who have written on Supreme Court history, structure or reform. 
Bauer and Rodriguez declined to comment.
Some of the commission's work would be conducted in public, under the usual rules for federal advisory panels, according to a person familiar with the set-up. Its report, with a six-month deadline, would likely be a starting point for executive-endorsed proposals, rather than a final recommendation for transforming the bench. 
When Biden first revealed the commission plan, in a CBS interview last fall, he said he wanted "recommendations as to how to reform the court system because it's getting out of whack." 
"It's not about court-packing," Biden said, responding to a question about the topic. "There's a number of other things that our constitutional scholars have debated. ... The last thing we need to do is turn the Supreme Court into just a political football, whoever has the most votes gets whatever they want. Presidents come and go. Supreme Court justices stay for generations." 
Justices are resistant to change 
Justices have historically bristled at loose proposals for the addition of seats or term limits. Congress sets the number of seats on the court, and any modification to life-tenure could arguably require a constitutional amendment. Some term-limit proponents suggest that life-tenure would be lifted if a justice were not stripped of his or her appointment after, for example, 18 years, but rather limited in what cases he or she could hear. 
The nine are known for their resistance to change. The court does not permit cameras in its courtroom and is not formally covered by a federal ethics code. 
Bauer, who previously co-chaired a bipartisan commission on election administration, has argued for a deeper discussion of Supreme Court reform, including term limits, supermajority voting requirements and ethics codes. 
He opposed adding more seats to the Supreme Court in a
 2018 Atlantic magazine
 piece headlined, "Don't Pack the Courts." He said the move "would sap the Supreme Court of its legitimacy."  
Several liberal advocacy groups have joined together to promote four court-related priorities: the addition of Supreme Court seats; expansion of lower courts; term limits on justices; and new ethics rules for the high court. 
Polls have shown Democrats more inclined than Republicans to support enlarging the high court. A Marquette Law School poll conducted in early September, for example, found 46% of adults in favor of increasing the number of justices on the US Supreme Court, with 53% opposed. Among Democrats, 61% favored expansion vs. 34% of Republicans. 
"Incrementalism isn't going to fly this time," Brett Edkins, political director of Stand Up America, said Friday. "The scale of the problem is huge. The Democrats have a narrow window of opportunity to repair it." 
History of 'court packing'  
With the result of the Georgia US Senate election earlier this month, both chambers of Congress are now controlled by Democrats. But the Democratic majority is slim, and there currently is no obvious appetite to add more seats to a bench whose numbers have not been changed since 1869. 
In earlier American history, there was more variation in the number of seats on the court, from a low of five to a high of 10. Politics often drove action to expand or contract the number of seats, although Congress would cloak its proposals in neutral justifications, for example, tied to caseload, as University of Alabama law professor Tara Leigh Grove has written. 
In a dramatic 1930s "court packing" attempt, President Franklin Delano Roosevelt asked Congress to add more justices to a bench that was invalidating his New Deal economic initiatives. FDR proposed a new justice for every sitting justice older than 70; six of the nine were then over 70. His plan failed. 
Roosevelt was targeting older conservative justices. Today, conservative justices are the relatively young ones. Barrett is 49, Neil Gorsuch is 53, and Brett Kavanaugh, 55. They are the three youngest justices. Stephen Breyer is the eldest, 82. Chief Justice John Roberts is 66. 
Braver, the University of Wisconsin professor, said that adding new seats carries significant dangers. 
"Court packing is a nuclear option. It would continue the political escalation and add new dangers," he said. "It's not hard to imagine people in the future thinking they can defy the court's rulings," because of shifts in the number of seats. 
He said a drawn-out study process may give the commission and the court time to observe each other. 
"It's kind of a sword of Damocles hanging over this court," Braver added on Friday. "The commission may or may not be pushed to certain positions based on how aggressive the court's rulings are in the meantime." 
"There is going to be a lot of disappointment in the law, a huge amount," she said Wednesday at an event hosted by the American Bar Association. "Look at me, look at my dissents."
Earlier this month, Sotomayor penned a scathing opinion when the court's majority allowed the Texas law to go into effect, calling the action "stunning."
"You know, I can't change Texas' law," Sotomayor said Wednesday, "but you can and everyone else who may or may not like it can go out there and be lobbying forces in changing laws that you don't like."
The justice then caught herself speaking about a contentious case currently before the court. 
"I am pointing out to that when I shouldn't because they tell me I shouldn't," she said. "But my point is that there are going to be a lot of things you don't like" and that the public can change.
On Monday when the new term starts, Sotomayor will likely enter a new season of dissent. The court is set to grapple with some of the biggest cases in Sotomayor's tenure, including another abortion case that represents a full-frontal attack on Roe v. Wade, as well as a Second Amendment dispute that could lead to the invalidation of gun restrictions in the country.
No one expects the 67-year-old justice to be in the majority in those cases.
"She is crafting arguments for future advocates, she is creating these road maps for how to restore rights to disempowered people," Brooklyn Law School's Alexis Hoag said at a recent event sponsored by the liberal American Constitution Society. "I'm looking for lengthy dissents." 
Last April, Sotomayor acknowledged that she was writing for the future at times. "Maybe," she said, "a later court will understand I was right."
George Washington University Law Professor David Fontana -- who once dubbed Sotomayor the "People's Justice" -- took to Twitter recently to highlight her role after the court's majority allowed the Texas law to go into effect.
"Sotomayor has chosen a different path," from Chief Justice John Roberts and others who are more moderate in their dissent, Fontana wrote. "Better to push and develop and alternative perspective by your vote rather than sacrifice the microphone."
"The Court's order is stunning," Sotomayor wrote at the time. "Presented with an application to join a flagrantly unconstitutional law engineered to prohibit women from exercising their constitutional rights and evade judicial scrutiny, a majority of the Justices have opted to bury their heads in the sand."
Sotomayor added: "The Court should not be so content to ignore its constitutional obligations to protect not only the rights of women, but also the sanctity of its precedents and of the rule of law," she concluded.
Last term, Sotomayor dissented in more than half of the divided cases for the third time in eight years, according to statistics 
compiled by Scotusblog.
 
In one case, the court made it easier to sentence juveniles to life without parole. Sotomayor seized on the dispute, noting that the majority had gutted recently decided precedent.
She also wrote the main dissent when a 6-3 court invalidated a California rule that required charitable organizations to disclose the names of their contributors. She noted that the opinion could impact donor disclosures in the political sphere by allowing more anonymous, so called "dark money" into the system. The majority, she said, marks disclosure requirements with a "bull's-eye."
She was in dissent too when the court said that two provisions of an Arizona voting law that restricts how ballots can be cast did not violate the historic Voting Rights Act and she disagreed with the majority in cases that came to the court via its emergency docket.
In November, for example, the court denied a request from inmates in a geriatric prison to allow further protections from Covid.
"The dangers of COVID-19 to these especially vulnerable inmates were undisputed and, indeed, indisputable," 
she wrote.
In January, she lashed out at the Trump administration's push to execute 13 death row inmates after nearly a two-decade pause.
"To put that in historical context, the Federal Government will have executed more than three times as many people in the last six months than it had in the previous six decades," she wrote.
CORRECTION: An earlier version of this story incorrectly stated the school with which Alexis Hoag is affiliated. She's a faculty member at Brooklyn Law School.
The private papers of justices who resolved those cases reveal the negotiations behind the decisions, including how the justices developed the cutoff line for when a state's interest in prohibiting abortion could surpass the woman's interest -- a flashpoint in today's debate. 
It was not until the final weeks of drafting in the 
1973 Roe v. Wade case
 that the justices settled on the point of viability, that is, when a fetus can live outside the mother's womb, now considered at about 22-24 weeks.  
The court will revisit that constitutional test tied to fetal viability this December when it hears the challenge to a 
Mississippi law 
that would ban abortion after 15 weeks of pregnancy.
In the balance lie women's reproductive rights and the scope of constitutional privacy protection. The case will lay bare the direction of the 
evolving court under Chief Justice John Roberts
, perhaps to make the most significant departure yet from courts back a half century. 
Justice 
Harry Blackmun
, writing the Roe opinion, at first considered the end of the first trimester of pregnancy (at about 12 weeks) as a dividing line. He was persuaded to delay that cutoff, by roughly another 12 weeks, after an initial suggestion by Justice 
Lewis Powell
 and reinforcement by others in the Roe majority. 
Blackmun himself explained as he prepared to amend his views that viability "has logical and biological justifications."
"There is a practical aspect, too," he continued in a memo to fellow justices, "for I am sure that there are many pregnant women, particularly younger girls, who may refuse to face the fact of pregnancy and who, for one reason or another, do not get around to medical consultation until the end of the first trimester is upon them or, indeed, has passed."
Some of that history surfaced
 in "friend of the court" briefs submitted this week in the Mississippi case and may be mined by the justices as they take up the most important abortion case since 1992, when the court affirmed Roe in 
Planned Parenthood of Southeastern Penn
sylvania v. Casey
. The court had grounded the right to end a pregnancy in the Fourteenth Amendment's due process guarantee of personal liberty. 
Overall, the now-public archives of justices who decided the two momentous abortion cases demonstrate individual soul-searching, as well as larger regard for the integrity of the court. 
The times were not as polarized, and Republicans played leading roles in crafting the decisions. Roe was decided by a 7-2 vote. Yet the decision was not pre-ordained. Justice 
William Brennan
 wrote in his personal account of Roe, available in his papers at the Library of Congress, that initially "it looked extremely doubtful that there would be a majority for the position that restrictive abortion laws are unconstitutional." 
Nearly 20 years later, similar tensions and uncertainty shrouded the dispute of Planned Parenthood v. Casey, which was a direct challenge to the right to obtain an abortion. Justices Sandra Day O'Connor, Anthony Kennedy and David Souter -- all nominated by Republican presidents -- worked secretly at first, without consulting other colleagues, to forge a compromise that would affirm Roe. 
Their decision, joined by two other justices and over the dissent of four others, declared that Roe's "essential holding ... is a recognition of the right of the woman to choose to have an abortion before viability and to obtain it without undue interference from the State." 
O'Connor, the country's first woman justice, 
said from the bench
 when the case was handed down, "Some of us as individuals find abortion offensive to our most basic principles of morality, but that can't control our decision. Our obligation is to define the liberty of all, not to mandate our own moral code."  
Abortion cases count among the most wrenching for the court, stirring religious, cultural and economic interests. In the early 1970s, before Roe v. Wade, some states were beginning to legalize abortion, but nationwide momentum was slow because of religious opposition, notably from the Catholic Church. 
When Roe was decided, Brennan was the only Catholic justice. Today, six of the nine justices are Catholic.   
The Roe v. Wade controversy, arising from the plight of a Texas carnival worker who said she was raped, was first argued in December 1971 and considered by a seven-justice bench. (Justices Hugo Black and John Marshal Harlan had suddenly retired due to ill health.) 
Once two new appointees of President Richard Nixon (Powell and 
William Rehnquist
) had been confirmed, then-Chief Justice Warren Burger, a fellow Nixon appointee, pushed for re-argument so that they could be part of the decision. Blackmun, also a Nixon appointee, agreed, writing: "I believe, on an issue so sensitive and so emotional as this one, the country deserves the conclusion of a nine-man, not a seven-man court, whatever the ultimate decision might be."  
Brennan, in particular, thought the addition of Powell and Rehnquist would diminish the chances for a decision finding a privacy right to abortion and wrote in his personal case history of the second round of oral arguments. 
"The questions from the Bench seemed to indicate clearly that Justice Blackmun had changed his mind on the abortion issue and that Justices Rehnquist and Powell would make five for the views expressed last Term by the Chief Justice and Justice (Byron) White," that is, against a right to abortion, Brennan wrote. 
"Nevertheless," Brennan continued, referring to the justices' private meeting after the oral arguments, "the vote at Conference was a surprising 7 to 2 in the Texas case." (Powell voted for an abortion right, Rehnquist against.) 
First draft to legal precedent 
When Blackmun sent around an early draft of his opinion on November 22, 1972, he explained that he had chosen the end of the first trimester of pregnancy to be the critical point after which a state could constitutionally regulate abortions. He said that in those first 12 weeks, the abortion decision should be kept between a woman and her doctor, without interference from government.  
Powell wrote Blackmun a private note a week later, saying he believed that a woman's constitutional right to abortion, protected from state regulation, should extend deeper into pregnancy. 
"I have wondered whether drawing the line at 'viability' -- if we conclude to designate a particular point in time -- would not be more defensible in logic and biologically than perhaps any other single time," Powell said in the note that is now in an archive at Washington and Lee Law School. "(T)he interest of the state is clearly identifiable, in a manner which would be generally understood, when the fetus becomes viable. At any point in time prior thereto, it is more difficult to justify a cutoff date." 
A group of 
13 constitutional law scholars highlighted that 
citation with other documents in a "friend of the court" filing this week as they urged the court to uphold "the viability line." They described it as "logical and workable, and one of the many lines this Court has drawn to protect constitutional liberties." 
Back in December 1972, Blackmun expressed concern about keeping the full seven-justice majority for the viability cutoff. "I could go along with viability if it could command a court," he wrote to Powell on December 4. Archival materials demonstrate that after Blackmun sent a December 11 memo to his colleagues, they indeed endorsed using fetus viability as a dividing line. 
Justice 
Thurgood Marshall
 wrote on December 12: "I am inclined to agree that drawing the line at viability accommodates the interests at stake better than drawing it at the end of the first trimester. Given the difficulties which many women may have in believing that they are pregnant and in deciding to seek an abortion, I fear that the earlier date may not in practice serve the interests of those women, which your opinion does seek to serve. 
"At the same time, however, I share your concern for recognizing the State's interest in insuring that abortions be done under safe conditions. If the opinion stated explicitly that, between the end of the first trimester and viability, state regulations directed at health and safety alone were permissible, I believe that those concerns would be adequately met," he added. 
Roe v. Wade adopted a trimester approach, with the second trimester focused on maternal health. Only during the third trimester could a state forbid abortion except when necessary to protect the woman's life or health. 
Dissenting in Roe were Rehnquist and White, an appointee of Democrat John F. Kennedy. (Rehnquist went on to become chief justice in 1986 and dissented when the justices upheld Roe in 1992.) 
Powell's private notes to his own file reflect the pride he took in persuading Blackmun to protect pregnant women through viability and his appreciation for a law clerk who helped him work through the issue, Larry Hammond. 
Powell wrote to Hammond on January 3, 1973, about three weeks before Roe v. Wade would be handed down. 
"It seems to me that Justice Blackmun has reached a constitutionally sound result and stated it clearly," Powell wrote. "Although he gives credit in his memo ... to others, I suggest that you are entitled -- particularly in view of your education of me on the viability issue -- to credit that is nonetheless substantial because it will never be recognized. I think I was perhaps the first to press for viability change." 
Decision transformed the court 
None of the justices who decided Roe v. Wade are alive today, and Hammond, who became a prominent criminal defense lawyer in Arizona, died last year.  
After the court announced Roe v. Wade on January 22, Brennan wrote: "Within a week, the letters were coming in at the rate of 2000-3000 a day and continued to do so at least a month. I, the only Catholic on the Court, and Justice Blackmun, the author of the opinion, received the bulk of the mail. The rhetoric and tone of the majority of the letters was extremely vitriolic." 
The abortion debate only grew in intensity. Ronald Reagan ran for the presidency in 1980 against abortion rights. His administration (1981-1989) and then that of President George H.W. Bush (1989-1993) pressed the Supreme Court to overrule Roe v. Wade. 
In 1992, it appeared that such pressure would succeed. But in Planned Parenthood v. Casey, Kennedy (a Reagan appointee) cast a crucial vote for abortion rights and maintaining the "viability" cutoff.
Kennedy had earlier staked out strong opposition to abortion rights, notably in a 1989 case when he joined a Rehnquist opinion attacking Roe v. Wade.
But Kennedy decided in the end that the matter should be left to a woman. In the joint opinion he signed with O'Connor and Souter in 1992, they affirmed Roe but dissolved the trimester framework and instituted a test that said government may not put an "undue burden" on a woman seeking to end a pregnancy. 
An undue burden exists, and a regulation should be invalidated, "if its purpose or effect is to place a substantial obstacle in the path of a woman seeking an abortion before the fetus attains viability." 
Those three justices conferred privately to develop the standard that affirmed Roe but gave states greater latitude for some regulations. In a personal note to Justice Blackmun, a month before the June 29 ruling, Kennedy wrote, "I need to see you as soon as you have a few free moments. I want to tell you about some developments in Planned Parenthood v. Casey, and at least part of what I say should come as welcome news." He told Blackmun that he believed it would "come as welcome news." (The note is in Blackmun's files at the Library of Congress.) 
Kennedy, age 85, retired in 2018 and did not respond to a CNN request for an interview. Justice O'Connor, age 91, resides in her home state of Arizona and revealed three years ago that she is suffering from Alzheimer's Disease.  
The third member of the crucial alliance, Souter, rested much of his decision on regard for precedent and that Americans had lived with Roe's protections for two decades. 
"Despite the controversy it has produced, the decision has not proven unworkable in practice," Souter said, referring to Roe, as he spoke from the bench when Planned Parenthood v. Casey was announced. "It has undoubtedly engendered reliance and countless people who have organized intimate relationships and made choices that define their views of themselves and their places in society in the two decades since it was handed down."
Souter said such consistency was important for public confidence in the Supreme Court. "Like the character of an individual, the legitimacy of the court must be earned over time," he
 said.
 
Souter, 82, retired from the court in 2009 and returned to his native New Hampshire. 
When contacted by CNN about Planned Parenthood v. Casey, he said he wanted "to be excused from voicing recollections of Casey." 
Added Souter: "I still think that on a judge's past decisions his silence is the best course." 
Biden's policy agenda -- from the $1 trillion "hard" infrastructure bill to the as-yet-unpriced social safety net package -- would, if passed, fundamentally alter the relationship we have with government.
In short: The era of small government (such as it ever existed) would be over. The era of expansive government would begin.
Except that a majority of Americans don't want more government in their lives, according to 
new data from Gallup
.
In the poll, just 43% said they wanted government to "do more to solve the country's problems," while 54% said they thought that government "is doing too many things that should be left to individuals and businesses."
That's a MAJOR shift in public opinion from where we were just one year ago, when 54% -- a record high in Gallup polling -- said they wanted government to do more to solve the country's problems.
That reaction, quite clearly, was the result of the 
Covid-19 pandemic
 -- and a general desire for the federal government to do whatever it could to get the country through the worst of it.
As Gallup's Jeffrey M. Jones notes
:
"Last year marked only the second time in Gallup's 29-year trend that at least half of Americans endorsed an active role for the government on this item. The other pro-government response came in the weeks after the 9/11 terror attacksProject Dynamo and Human First Coalition said in a press release that the group of evacuees were "moved overland, COVID tested, MMR vaccinated, securely housed and evacuated to safety the afternoon of September 28, 2021 at 2:00 P.M. local time."
Among the passengers evacuated from Kabul were 59 children under the age of 18 and 16 under age 3, according to the groups.
"We would like to thank the U.S. State Department and the United Arab Emirates' Ministry of Foreign Affairs for their cooperation in challenging circumstances to secure the safe return of these U.S. citizens, U.S. Legal Permanent Residents, and Afghan allies," the press release said. "We would also like to acknowledge the Taliban for facilitating the departure of the aircraft by allowing those who want to depart Afghanistan to do so peacefully."
Project Dynamo's co-founder Bryan Stern told CNN Wednesday that they had landed in the UAE but claimed that their follow-on flight to the United States had been denied landing rights in the US. He said they had been "stuck" in the capital of Abu Dhabi and "have been trying to get out."
An administration official noted that this is security protocol. Once the flight landed in the UAE, US government officials had to verify the accuracy of the manifest and the passengers' travel documents. The official described it as the system working as it should, and that as passengers are verified, they expect them to be rebooked on commercial flights and be able to fly to the United States.
A State Department spokesperson on Wednesday confirmed that "a privately organized charter flight arrived in Abu Dhabi overnight from Kabul."
"Our embassy staff in the UAE has been working around the clock to verify the accuracy of the passenger manifest and is coordinating with DHS/Customs and Border Protection on the ground to ensure the passengers are screened and vetted before they are permitted to fly to the United States," they said.
"We expect the passengers to continue onward travel tomorrow morning," the spokesperson said, adding, "We are grateful to the government of the UAE for its support."
A Department of Homeland Security spokesperson told CNN Wednesday that "all US-bound flights must follow the established safety, security, and health protocols before they are cleared for departure."
"This process requires flight manifests to be verified before departure to the US to ensure all passengers are screened appropriately," they said.
On Monday, a senior State Department official had said the United States was working to facilitate the departure of about 100 American citizens and green card holders who had indicated they were ready to leave Afghanistan.
That official told reporters they are "constantly touching base" with US citizens believed to still be in Afghanistan, as well as other governments, private groups and aircraft carriers to try to arrange charter flights.
That official said there had been "challenges" with the charter flights that had come to US government reception points, including stowaways, unaccompanied minors and passengers who were not on the manifests.
The official described the Taliban's "unpredictability regarding who is permitted to depart" as the biggest impediment to the departure of US citizens and others from Afghanistan. The absence of regular commercial air service is another big constraint, the official said.
"There's a range of contact and dialogue ongoing with the Taliban, particularly in Doha, with the remaining members of the Taliban political commission who are based there," the official said.
Secretary of Defense Lloyd Austin said Tuesday during a Senate Armed Services Committee hearing that a group of 21 US citizens and their family members had been able to leave Afghanistan that day, but declined to give further details about their departure.
Austin could not provide a number of how many Americans are left in Afghanistan, saying the figure "fluctuates daily." 
"This has been a dynamic process, but again we will stay focused on this," he added.
State Department Principal Deputy Spokesperson Jalina Porter told reporters Tuesday that the department was not in a position to confirm those additional departures due to "security reasons" and referred to the Department of Defense.
This story has been updated with additional information.
Ossoff's victory and that of fellow Georgia Democrat the Rev. Raphael Warnock flip the Senate, giving President-elect Joe Biden the power to potentially enact sweeping, liberal legislation and push through Cabinet nominations without Republican support. The Senate's party split will be 50-50 with Vice President-elect Kamala Harris breaking tie votes.
LIVE UPDATES: Georgia Senate runoff election
Warnock, the senior pastor of Ebenezer Baptist Church in Atlanta, and Ossoff will respectively be the first Black and Jewish senators to represent Georgia.
"At this moment of crisis, as Covid-19 continues to ravage our state and our country, when hundreds of thousands have lost their lives, millions have lost livelihoods, Georgia families are having difficulty putting food on the table -- fearing foreclosure or eviction, having difficulty making ends meet -- let's unite now to beat this virus and rush economic relief to the people of our state and to the American people," Ossoff said earlier Wednesday ahead of CNN's projection.
After no Georgia US Senate candidate received 50% of the vote in November, the races turned to two runoffs with control of the Senate at stake. While Ossoff and Warnock ran on a unity ticket, Trump refused to concede his own loss, sparking a fight within the Republican Party and disenchanting some of his supporters, who believed his false claims that the vote was rigged.
Trump's ongoing onslaught against the Republican officials in charge of the elections pressured the two GOP senators, Kelly Loeffler and David Perdue, to make a choice: Join the President in seeking to overturn the democratic outcome or risk losing Trump supporters.
Despite three recounts and no evidence of widespread fraud, Loeffler and Perdue decided to join the President in supporting an objection to Congress' certification of the Electoral College's results on Wednesday in a final, deluded display of devotion to Trump supporters.
"I'm obviously disappointed," said Eric Tanenblatt, a longtime Georgia Republican strategist. "Clearly the distractions and sideshows impacted the outcome."
Progressives are already looking at how Democrats should use their newfound power, advocating for the Senate to "go nuclear" and eliminate the filibuster, which requires that most legislation obtain 60 votes to advance, in order to pass a more ambitious agenda. Senate Democratic leader Chuck Schumer of New York dodged a question on Wednesday on whether his caucus will lower the threshold to a simple majority vote, saying it is united in wanting "big, bold change" and would "discuss the best ways to get that done."
He said that "one of the first" bills he'd like to pass as Senate majority leader would provide $2,000 stimulus checks to help Americans suffering from the coronavirus pandemic, which Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell, recently blocked despite President Donald Trump's support for enhanced aid. Democratic senators, who have been in the minority for six years, are now evaluating how to wield their gavels across various committees to address the health and economic crises.
"Georgia's voters delivered a resounding message yesterday: they want action on the crises we face and they want it right now," said Biden in a statement. "On Covid-19, on economic relief, on climate, on racial justice, on voting rights and so much more."
Schumer will have a minuscule margin for error balancing the priorities of the left and the politically vulnerable.
Democrats acknowledged the intraparty fight to come. Maine independent Sen. Angus King, who caucuses with the Democrats, told CNN that he is "very reluctant" to eliminate the filibuster but looks forward to changing the rules to disincentivize its "abuse."
Montana Democratic Sen. Jon Tester, a moderate who faces a 2024 election in his red state, said on Wednesday that he hoped the filibuster would remain to encourage bipartisanship.
"Bipartisan legislation tends to stand the test of time," said Tester. 
But the left wants Schumer to get rid of it so that House Speaker Nancy Pelosi, a California Democrat, and the Senate can pass their long-awaited wish list. Massachusetts Democratic Rep. Ayanna Pressley tweeted on Wednesday that "the movement" to end cash bail, abolish Immigrations and Customs Enforcement and support Black lives "organized to deliver" Congress and the White House. "It's time we deliver for them," she said.
A Democratic-led Senate could also confirm Biden's nominees without Republican support, allowing the new administration to go bolder in its Cabinet picks and begin to overhaul the conservatives' massive gains on the judicial bench over the past four years. 
Biden plans 
to pick federal Judge Merrick Garland
 for attorney general, creating a vacancy on the US Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia. If McConnell were in charge of the Senate, the Biden administration might've gone with someone like former Alabama Democratic Sen. Doug Jones to avoid the Kentucky Republican's influence over that critical judicial vacancy. 
"Obviously, with Democratic control [of the Senate], the ability of Joe Biden to move nominations forward will be easier," said Schumer.
Perdue and Loeffler entered the Senate runoffs with some advantages. Loeffler, one of the richest members of Congress, spent tens of millions on her race, while Perdue, a first-term senator and former Fortune 500 CEO, has earned over 88,000 more votes than the 33-year-old Ossoff two months ago.
Warnock and Ossoff campaigned on ending the coronavirus crisis, which has infected more than 20.8 million Americans and killed at least 354,000, in order to reopen the economy. They pushed for debt-free public college and a new Voting Rights Act. And they attacked the Republican senators for their multimillion-dollar stock transactions during the pandemic, alleging that they profited off it. The senators have denied any wrongdoing.
But Loeffler's and Perdue's campaigns were quickly subsumed by Trump's attacks on the Democratic outcome. Trump recently appeared to pressure Georgia Secretary of State Brad Raffensperger on a private call, urging him to "find" enough votes to reverse his loss in Georgia, a state that every GOP presidential candidate had won since 1996. Raffensperger, a Republican, refused.
Perdue and Loeffler attempted to sidestep the intraparty fight by focusing their remarks on their Democratic opponents. 
Perdue's closing message was littered with attacks, saying in a minute-long video that if Republicans lose, undocumented immigrants will vote, Americans' private health insurance will be "taken away," and Democrats will pack the Supreme Court and defund the police.
"We win Georgia, we save America," said Perdue to the camera.
But Warnock and Ossoff countered that they would "demilitarize" rather than defund the police, create a legal pathway for undocumented immigrants and support a public option to decrease the number of uninsured. Neither Democratic candidate has advocated adding justices to the court. 
"Kelly Loeffler spends tens of millions of dollars to scare you," said Warnock in an ad. "She's trying to make you afraid of me because she's afraid of you. Afraid that you understand how she's used her position in the Senate to enrich herself and others like her. Afraid that you'll realize that we can do better."
Now, Democrats will confront the question of how far they will go following the Trump administration. They spent Wednesday celebrating their quick reversal of fortune after being so long out of power.
"I think we're going to do big things," said Ohio Democratic Sen. Sherrod Brown. "I think that the overwhelming number of Democrats are pointing in the same direction on all of this. Some faster than others, but all in the same direction."
This story has been updated with additional developments Wednesday.
"I would say somewhere between 99 and 100 percent,"
 Jason Miller told Cheddar 
earlier this month when asked about the chances that Trump runs again. "I think he is definitely running in 2024."
Which sounds, well, sort of definitive -- ahem -- right?
Then there's this from Ohio Rep. Jim Jordan during a stop in Iowa -- eyes emoji! -- last week. "I think he's gonna run,"
 Jordan said of Trump.
 "I want him to run. He's proven he can take the heat. 
Now, Trump himself hasn't been as conclusive but he has made very clear he is leaning toward getting into the 2024 race.
 As Politico wrote in May
:
"Trump is confiding in allies that he intends to run again in 2024 with one contingency: that he still has a good bill of health, according to two sources close to the former president. That means Trump is going to hang over the Republican Party despite its attempts to rebrand during his exile and its blockade of a Trump-centric investigation into January's insurrection."
Earlier that same month,
 Trump was barely coy about his future plans
 in an interview with conservative pundit Candace Owens. "As you know, it's very early," Trump told Owens. "But I think people are going to be very, very happy when I make a certain announcement."
And late last week, he sent out poll results -- via his Save America PAC -- that showed him leading the potential 2024 GOP field by a wide margin.
It's worth noting here that it's in Trump's interests (and Miller's and Jordan's too) to insist that not only is the former president thinking about running again but that he is also moving toward the race.
Trump -- and those close to him -- want to retain as much political power as possible. The simplest way to do that is to signal that Trump is very much in the mix to be a candidate in 2024.  
Positioning him that way makes Trump -- still -- the center of power in the party, forcing any and every candidate on the ballot in 2022 to make a pilgrimage to Mar-a-Lago to kiss the ring. It also has the effect of freezing the 2024 field, complicating any and all pitches by candidates not named "Donald Trump."
So, when former Secretary of State Mike Pompeo or Arkansas Sen. Tom Cotton go to Iowa, they have to make the obligatory nod to the possibility of Trump running again because, well, to not do so would run the risk of being seen by the base as insufficiently loyal to the former president.
All that said, there's really no reason for either Miller or Jordan to be so definitive when describing the chances Trump will run again in 2024 in order to accomplish those goals.
After all, if Miller said Trump is 50-50 on a 2024 bid, the field would still be effectively frozen until Trump decided what he wants to do. Same goes for candidates in 2022 seeking Trump's approval for their own candidacies. Ditto his prominence within the party.
The willingness to say Trump is "definitely" running or "he's gonna run" suggests, at least to me, that both Miller and Jordan have been told by Trump himself that he is planning to go for the presidency again in 2024. (In both of the interviews I cited above, Miller and Jordan made clear that they regularly speak to Trump and had spoken to him in recent days.)
Trump being Trump, the fact that he is likely telling advisers he plans to run again needs to be viewed at least somewhat skeptically. This is a man who changes his mind on a dime -- and often without any real reason or explanation. 
But, at least as of today, Trump seems set on running again. Which 
virtually ensures he would be the party's 2024 nominee
.
Congressional Democrats spent the entire last week negotiating -- and fighting -- with themselves over the fate of two bills: 1) a $1 trillion bipartisan infrastructure plan that has already passed the Senate with 69 votes and b) a several-trillion-dollar -- we think -- social safety net program that contains many of President Joe Biden's first term agenda within it.
Neither bill got a vote -- despite a previous promise from Speaker Nancy Pelosi that the infrastructure bill would, for sure, be voted on last Monday -- or at least sometime last week.
The impasse left House Democrats headed to their home districts with absolutely nothing to show for their very-public efforts, except a very bright line drawn between its moderate and liberal wings.
"We were elected to achieve reasonable, common sense solutions for the American people -- not to obstruct from the far wings," 
said New Jersey Rep. Josh Gottheimer
, a leading House moderate, in a statement after the infrastructure vote was called off. "This far left faction is willing to put the President's entire agenda, including this historic bipartisan infrastructure package, at risk. They've put civility and bipartisan governing at risk."
New York Rep. Alexandria Ocasio Cortez, a prominent liberal, wasn't backing down either. "We need to be real: Are we going to deliver universal pre-K to this country or not?," 
she said
. "Are we going to expand health care to our seniors and include vision and dental or not? Are we going to invest in housing ... or not? That's what we need to know."
Here's the problem for Democrats: They are in charge of every lever of governance. They control both houses of Congress. They control the White House. 
Voters know those facts. And, if the past is prologue, have an expectation that Democrats will, therefore, be able to get things done for the country. 
(Sidebar: The nitty gritty of this situation is far more complicated, with consolidated Republican opposition and the very narrow Democratic majorities making it very difficult to pass much of anything. But the average voter either doesn't know or doesn't care about those caveats.) 
Not getting things done then has a very clear political impact. Almost 9 in 10 voters (88%) said that the federal government making "a significant investment in improving infrastructure" was either "very" or "somewhat" important to them in 
a September CNN poll.
 (It was the highest priority measured in the poll.)
There's other data in that poll that should concern Democrats after the week they've had. Almost 7 in 10 (69%) said that things in the country are going either "pretty or "very" badly. Nearly 3 in 4 (75%) described themselves as "angry" when thinking about the state of the country at the moment. Almost 8 in 10 (77%) said they were worried about the state of the economy.
That is a portrait of a very uneasy -- and combustible -- electorate, an electorate looking to punish politicians who don't give them what they want when they want it.
And, with Democrats in power, the punishment meted out by voters will fall disproportionately on them -- especially if the current divisions on displays between liberals and moderates can't be solved or at least mitigated in a way that allows for a popular measure like the infrastructure bill to be passed.
This is a 
very
 fraught moment for Democrats. What happens in the next month could well determine the party's fate in the coming midterm elections.
The review of Fulton County's absentee ballots, which is not set to begin until the judge reviews the terms of the audit, comes as conservatives have clamored for election audits in a number of states in the wake of former President Donald Trump's November loss. The baseless belief that there was widespread fraud has persisted among some Republicans, despite the lack of evidence.
While the Fulton County case paves the way for yet another ballot audit, it will not lead to Georgia's election results -- which have already been certified for 
President Joe Biden
 -- being overturned.
The decision in Georgia comes after a handful of plaintiffs filed a lawsuit to access the ballots. But the audit in Fulton County is likely to come with more stipulations than the opaquely operated, 
GOP-run audit 
playing out in Arizona's Maricopa County.
While Henry County Judge Brian Amero ordered that the ballots be unsealed, "Petitioners shall only be permitted to inspect and scan said ballots in accordance with protocols and practices that will be set forth by further order of the Court," according to 
court documents
. The judge directed counsel for the parties to convene where the ballots are being stored next week. 
Garland Favorito, one of the plaintiffs who brought the lawsuit and the co-founder of Voters Organized for Trusted Election Results in Georgia, said he and his counterparts are formulating a plan to scan and forensically analyze the Fulton County mail-in ballots. He said they will submit that plan to the judge before May 28.
Favorito told CNN that he hopes roughly half a dozen experts will have a chance to evaluate the newly scanned ballot images and search for characteristics that could determine whether any ballots are counterfeit.
"The reason that we want to do it is to determine whether or not there are counterfeit ballots," Favorito said.
Fulton County Chairman Robb Pitts, a Democrat, slammed the push for yet another review of the 2020 election.
"It is outrageous that Fulton County continues to be a target of those who cannot accept the results from last year's election," Pitts said. "The votes have been counted three times, including a hand recount, and no evidence of fraud has been found. The fact remains that Fulton County safely and securely carried out an election in the midst of a public health pandemic. It's a shame to see that the 'Big Lie' lives on and could cost the hardworking taxpayers of this county."
He dismissed concerns about counterfeit ballots as little more than a conservative pipe dream. 
"This conspiracy theory about counterfeit ballots has been trotted out by proponents of the 'Big Lie' across the country and shot down every time," Pitts said. "Whether it's looking for bamboo in Arizona's ballots or searching for counterfeits in Fulton's, it is nonsense."
Georgia Secretary of State Brad Raffensperger, a Republican who has come under fire from many members of his own party after standing up to Trump's attempts to overturn the election, offered a more sanguine response to the judge's ruling. 
"From day one I have encouraged Georgians with legitimate concerns about the election in their counties to pursue those claims through legal avenues," Raffensperger said in a statement. "Fulton County has a longstanding history of election mismanagement that has understandably weakened voters' faith in its system. Allowing this audit provides another layer of transparency and citizen engagement." 
The Georgia Secretary of State's office also noted that Georgia counties have already undergone hand audits and re-scanned each ballot after the Trump campaign requested a recount. Those reviews upheld the original election result showing Biden won the state -- the first Democrat to do so since 1992. 
Other conservatives, including former Sen. Kelly Loeffler, cheered the judge's decision.
"Voter confidence in our election system is the bedrock of our republic," she said in a statement. "Unfortunately, inconsistencies in Fulton County's November 2020 absentee ballots cast serious doubt on voters' faith in our elections."
But the audit will not change the results of the election. 
"It's not an election challenge and therefore this case alone could not do that," Favorito said. "What this case is about is the equal protection and due process, constitutional rights, of the plaintiffs and all Georgia voters. Because if counterfeit ballots were introduced into the certified results, it diluted our votes and the votes of all Georgians both within and outside of Fulton County." 
CORRECTION: An earlier version of this story misstated the number of experts Garland Favorito wants to examine images of mail-in ballots from Fulton County, Georgia. He said he wanted about half a dozen experts to evaluate the images.
Trump's allies are already demanding a new review of another Arizona county won by 
President Joe Biden
. They are launching more partisan ballot reviews in other states following the Arizona playbook after passing laws making it harder to vote earlier this year. And they are calling for decertification of Arizona's 2020 election despite the lack of fraud, as part of a larger effort to validate Trump's "Big Lie" and undermine the 
2020 election results
.
The lesson they're taking from Arizona's Maricopa County ballot review is not that they failed and should stop, but rather that they should try to avoid the negative scrutiny that hounded the Cyber Ninjas' review and "do it better" in states like Wisconsin and Pennsylvania, even if there's no evidence of fraud, said Sarah Longwell, a conservative publisher and executive director of the conservative group Defending Democracy Together.
"It has nothing to do with auditing votes," Longwell told CNN. "It has to do with creating a cloud of suspicion around the elections and keeping their fraud narrative front and center."
The partisan ballot review in Maricopa County released last week reaffirmed Biden's victory. But Trump and the Arizona GOP officials who backed it ignored that conclusion and the highly problematic nature of the review itself, run by a company inexperienced in election audits and which failed to follow standard auditing procedures, and instead touted other issues raised in their report -- even though they were quickly rebutted by election experts and county officials. 
Similar election "audits" already are 
moving forward in Pennsylvania and Wisconsin
. And Texas' secretary of state's office announced a "full and comprehensive forensic audit" in four counties hours after Trump fired off a letter to Republican Gov. Greg Abbott demanding just such a review.
The partisan reviews of the 2020 election results have come after a host of Republican-led state legislatures enacted restrictive voting laws, frequently citing Trump's lies as reason to enact new measures in the name of "election integrity." Eighteen states, including Arizona, have enacted laws this year that make it harder to vote, according to a tally by the liberal-leaning Brennan Center for Justice at New York University's School of Law.
In one sign of how much the falsehoods about the 2020 election have become linked to the GOP's identity, a 
recent CNN poll
 found that nearly 6 in 10 Republicans and Republican-leaning independents said "believing that Donald Trump won the 2020 election" was "very" or "somewhat" important to their definition of what it now means to be a Republican.
Richard Hasen, an election law expert at University of California Irvine School of Law, said he once thought that it would require "some kernel of truth" for people to believe the falsehood that the 2020 election had been rigged. 
"It turns out that no matter how much proof there is that the election was done fairly, people are going to continue to believe the 'Big Lie' because it's being constantly repeated by Trump and his allies," said Hasen, who co-directs the Fair Elections and Free Speech Center at UC Irvine.
"One would think in a real world, that even this fake audit, that was stacked in favor of helping Trump, that a finding in favor of Biden would have deflated the enthusiasm. And maybe it has among some," he added. "But facts don't matter when you're incessantly lying about election integrity."
Trump falsely claims Arizona victory
In the days since the final report was released in Arizona last week, 
Trump
 and his supporters have ignored its topline result. Instead, they have insisted the review backed up various conspiracy theories they have spent months advancing.
Arizona state GOP Rep. Mark Finchem -- the Trump-endorsed candidate for Arizona Secretary of State -- claimed in an email to supporters over the weekend that Cyber Ninjas and its subcontractors had uncovered "red handed" evidence of fraud.
He called for another audit, this time in Pima County -- home to the state's second largest city, Tucson. Biden won that county by more than 18 percentage points last November. 
Finchem also repeated his demand that the election results be decertified, although there is no process for doing so in Arizona. Finchem, who announced his run for Arizona secretary of state in March, 
has promoted QAnon conspiracy theories
. He also attended the January 6 "Stop the Steal" rally in Washington. He has denied any involvement in the riot at the US Capitol. 
Trump wasted little time claiming victory as the report leaked out late Thursday last week. The former President released more than a half dozen statements over the next day and after the results were presented, attacking the media for correctly reporting that the review confirmed Biden's victory and falsely claiming it was "a big win for us." 
Trump continued at a campaign-style rally in Georgia on Saturday, where he once again attacked Georgia's Republican leaders who had balked at his attempts to overturn the 2020 election.
"It is clear, in Arizona that they must decertify the election, you heard the numbers," Trump said. "It's a disgrace. We won on the Arizona forensic audit yesterday on a level you wouldn't believe."
In his written statements, Trump cited the report claiming 23,000 mail-in ballots votes were cast by voters from a prior address, which the Cyber Ninjas said may have had a "critical" impact on the election. But Maricopa County 
quickly debunked
 that claim on Twitter, writing that it was "legal under federal law."
"To label it a 'critical' concern is either intentionally misleading or staggeringly ignorant. AZ senators should know this too," the county wrote.
Before the release of the Cyber Ninjas' review, election experts and Republican and Democratic elections officials in Arizona warned the findings should not be taken seriously. The Cyber Ninjas, a 
Florida-based company
, had no experience auditing election results, and its leader has 
repeated wild conspiracy theories
 about election fraud. The company and its volunteers and subcontractors 
did not follow
 standard auditing procedures, and 
observers from
 Democratic Secretary of State Katie Hobbs' office 
repeatedly cited
 instances in which those conducting the review broke their own rules.
GOP-led 'audits' spread to more states
That had not stopped other Trump-aligned Republicans from touting the audit. Earlier this year, Kristina Karamo, who is running for Michigan secretary of state with Trump's support, 
toured the site
 of the Maricopa County ballot review.
 And, in July, months before Cyber Ninjas released its report, she 
described the review
 as demonstrating corruption in the state's election system.
Rep. Jody Hice, the Trump-endorsed House Republican in Georgia challenging the state's Republican Secretary of State Brad Raffensperger, spoke ahead of Trump at Saturday's rally in Perry, Georgia. Hice did not mention the Arizona ballot review, but he continued spreading the false claims about voting systems that Trump has clung to since the election was called for Biden in November and called for more audits. 
"We've got to deal with Dominion voting machines," Hice said, a reference to the debunked conspiracy theories about voting machines in the state. "We've got to deal with the corruption that's allowed. We've got to have audits."
Leaders of "audit" efforts in other key states also made the pilgrimage to Arizona in recent months amid the ballot review there.
In Wisconsin -- a presidential battleground that flipped from red to blue last November -- a conservative former state Supreme Court justice Michael Gableman, is leading a GOP-ordered $680,000 taxpayer-funded election review. He visited the Maricopa ballot review  site over the summer. 
So have Republican lawmakers from Pennsylvania, another crucial swing state Biden won last year. Republicans in the state Senate there recently approved a wide-ranging subpoena for personal information about millions of voters as they work to advance their probe of election results in the Keystone State. Senate Democrats and the state's Democratic Attorney General Josh Shapiro have sued to block the effort.
Texas' election audit of four counties, which the secretary of state's office announced last week, is taking place in a state Trump won. But the announcement came after Trump wrote a letter to Abbott demanding an audit. While the secretary's office stated that the "full forensic audit" was already underway, several counties told CNN last week they 
had not heard anything about it
. 
Hasen, who recently wrote a 
paper warning of the risks
 of election subversion in 2024, said it's "incredibly dangerous" that people who continue to promote the "Big Lie" are running to oversee future elections. 
"No. 1, it will further undermine people's confidence in the process," Hasen said. "And No. 2, someone who believes or purports to believe that the last election was stolen is more likely to act in a way to not conduct a fair election as a kind of payback for the supposed rigging the last time."
Corporate America had been trying to
 navigate two competing pandemic realities
: Companies are desperately trying to get back to business as usual, and mandating vaccines is among the best ways to accomplish that. But a labor shortage had tied their hands, as businesses have been worried that forcing people to get the shot would send some 
desperately needed employees
 and potential new hires packing.
Some state and local governments had imposed various vaccine mandates, others had outright banned them The order prohibits any government entity from issuing vaccine passports and blocks businesses from requiring any such documentation.
DeSantis cited freedom and privacy concerns as the primary basis for the action,  arguing that the implementation and enforcement of vaccine passports would "create two classes of citizens based on vaccinations."
The order notes many Floridians have not yet had the opportunity to obtain a vaccine, while some may have infection-acquired immunity, and other people may be unable to get a Covid-19 vaccine because of health, religious or other reasons.
"Individual Covid-19 vaccination records are private health information and should not be shared by a mandate," DeSantis' executive order reads. 
DeSantis signaled earlier this week that he would not support vaccine passports.
"It's completely unacceptable for either the government or the private sector to impose upon you the requirement that you show proof of vaccine to just simply be able to participate in normal society," he said Monday during a press conference.
Florida requires children to receive
 certain vaccines
 before enrolling and attending childcare and school.
The Florida governor 
tweeted
 Friday that the Florida legislature is "working on making permanent these protections for Floridians," and that he looks forward to signing them into law soon.
Privacy fears
There have been major privacy concerns regarding vaccine passports, especially if a centralized, computer-based system were created for people to prove they've been vaccinated against Covid-19.
American Civil Liberties Union senior policy analyst Jay Stanley argued in an 
article
 this week for a decentralized, open-sourced system to make sure people know how and where their data is being used.
"Does it report back every time you present a credential?" Stanley asked. "Every time someone asks to see you've received a vaccine? Does it report back to some government agency? That would also be very bad."
The 
Biden administration
 has been working with non-profits and tech firms to develop a set of standards for people to prove they've gotten the vaccine, according to at least two administration officials.
However, White House Press Secretary Jen Psaki said Monday there will be no federal mandate that would require every American to get a vaccine credential.
The scheme put forward by controversial lawyer John Eastman was outlined in a 
two-page memo
 obtained by the authors for "Peril," and which was subsequently obtained by CNN. The memo, which has not previously been made public, provides new detail showing how Trump and his team tried to persuade Pence to subvert the Constitution and throw out the election results on January 6.
The effort to sway Pence was just one of several behind-the-scenes attempts that Trump's team undertook ahead of January 6 in a desperate bid to overturn the 2020 election loss, after dozens of lawsuits were thrown out of the courts. "Peril," which will be released Tuesday, details how Eastman's memo was sent to GOP Sen. Mike Lee of Utah and how Trump attorney Rudy Giuliani tried to convince fellow Republican Sen. Lindsey Graham of South Carolina of election fraud. But both Lee and Graham scoffed at the arguments and found they had no merit.
"You might as well make your case to Queen Elizabeth II. Congress can't do this. You're wasting your time," Lee said to Trump's lawyers trying to overturn the results in Georgia, according to the book.
The Eastman memo laid out a six-step plan for Pence to overturn the election for Trump, which included throwing out the results in seven states because they allegedly had competing electors. In fact, no state had actually put forward an alternate slate of electors -- there were merely Trump allies claiming without any authority to be electors. 
Under Eastman's scheme, Pence would have declared Trump the winner with more Electoral College votes after the seven states were thrown out, at 232 votes to 222. Anticipating "howls" from Democrats protesting the overturning of the election, the memo proposes, Pence would instead say that no candidate had reached 270 votes in the Electoral College. That would throw the election to the House of Representatives, where each state would get one vote. Since Republicans controlled 26 state delegations, a majority could vote for Trump to win the election. 
The plan was first proposed to Pence when Eastman was with Trump in the Oval Office on January 4, during one of Trump's attempts to convince Pence that he had the authority to stop the certification of the election.
"You really need to listen to John. He's a respected constitutional scholar. Hear him out," Trump said to Pence at that meeting, Woodward and Costa write in "Peril."
In the memo, Eastman went so far as to suggest Pence should take action without warning.
"The main thing here is that Pence should do this without asking for permission -- either from a vote of the joint session or from the Court," Eastman wrote. "The fact is that the Constitution assigns this power to the Vice President as the ultimate arbiter. We should take all of our actions with that in mind."
In the end, Pence didn't go along with Eastman's scheme, concluding that the Constitution did not give him any power beyond counting the Electoral College votes. He did his own consultations before January 6, according to the book, reaching out to former Vice President Dan Quayle and the Senate parliamentarian, who were both clear in telling him he had no authority beyond counting the votes.
When Pence refused to intervene, Trump turned on his vice president, attacking him on Twitter even as the insurrection at the Capitol was unfolding on January 6. 
The memo could be of interest to the House select committee now investigating the January 6 attack on the Capitol, which recently 
requested documents
 from the National Archives that specifically included communications involving Eastman.
"It shows intent, a sophisticated plan, a blueprint to illegally and unconstitutionally overturn and steal the election" by Trump and his team based on false and misleading information and legal arguments, a source familiar with the investigation told CNN.
'Lee's head was spinning'
Eastman spoke at the January 6 rally that preceded the attack on the Capitol. He retired from his position as a professor at Chapman University a week after January 6, which 
occurred amid protests
 from faculty at the Southern California university over his participation in Trump's efforts to overturn the election. 
Eastman told the Washington Post that his memo merely "explored all options that had been proposed." In an interview on Tuesday, Eastman told CNN that the two-page memo had been only a preliminary draft. He provided CNN with a longer 
six-page memo
 laying out numerous other scenarios for Pence to follow on January 6. Eastman told CNN that during the January 4 meeting he'd had in the Oval Office with Trump and Pence, he had told Pence he should only delay certifying votes in the seven states, not try to throw the election to Trump.
The reality, however, is that a delay was simply another avenue to stop Biden from taking office. 
Eastman said he had told Pence it was an open question whether he had the authority to unilaterally set aside slates of electors, but that it would be "foolish" to exercise that power because state legislatures had not certified the alternate slates put forward by Trump allies.
As part of the efforts of Trump's team to convince Congress not to certify the election, the initial two-page Eastman memo was given to Lee, one of the Senate's top Republican constitutional authorities. At the same time, Giuliani sent multiple memos to Graham trying to convince him that the claims of election fraud coming from Trump's team were legitimate.
The memos show how even some of Trump's closest allies balked at the measures Trump's team was taking behind the scenes to try to overturn his loss to Biden. But while Lee and Graham heard out the cases from Trump's lawyers, they soundly rejected their claims, Woodward and Costa write. 
Lee was shocked by the claims the memo was making, since no state had considered, let alone put forward, any alternate slates of electors. "Lee's head was spinning," the authors write. "No such procedure existed in the Constitution, any law or past practice. Eastman had apparently drawn it out of thin air."
Lee also dismissed the Trump team's arguments that it had a case to overturn the election results in Georgia, saying they had to be made in court. 
'Third grade'
Woodward and Costa also obtained several memos Giuliani sent to Graham to try to convince him of election fraud in Georgia and other states. CNN has also obtained those memos.
The authors write that on January 2, Giuliani briefed Graham at the White House. Giuliani presented a statistical analysis arguing Biden's win was impossible, but Graham dismissed Giuliani's evidence as too abstract. "Give me some names. You need to put it in writing. You need to show me the evidence," Graham said, according to the book.
Giuliani then sent Graham several memos and affidavits claiming fraud. But when Graham's chief Judiciary Committee counsel Lee Holmes went over the claims, he found they were sloppy, overbearing and "added up to nothing," Woodward and Costa write. "Holmes reported to Graham that the data in the memos were a concoction, with a bullying tone and eighth grade writing."
"Third grade," Graham responded, according to the book. "I can get an affidavit tomorrow saying the world is flat." 
Giuliani did not respond to a request for comment.
Trump has continued to push baseless claims that the election was stolen from him. Last week, he sent a new letter to Georgia Secretary of State Brad Raffensperger claiming he should start the process of decertifying the 2020 election.
Criminal investigators in the state 
have been investigating
 Trump's efforts to overturn Georgia's 2020 election results, including an infamous call Trump made to Raffensperger in which Trump urged the secretary of state to "find" more than 11,000 votes that Trump needed to win.
Graham also made a phone call to Raffensperger, which is part of the Fulton County district attorney's probe. Graham 
has said his call
 was to understand the process of verifying signatures on mail-in ballots.
This story has been updated with a full version of the memo from Eastman.
The supply chain nightmare is jacking up prices for consumers and slowing the global economic recovery. Unfortunately, Moody's Analytics warns supply chain disruptions "will get worse before they get better."
"As the global economic recovery continues to gather steam, what is increasingly apparent is how it will be stymied by supply-chain disruptions that are now showing up at every corner," Moody's wrote in a Monday report. 
Indeed, the IMF downgraded its 2021 US growth forecast on Tuesday by one percentage point, the most for any G7 economy. The IMF cited supply chain disruptions and weakening consumption The new rules will require all foreign nationals arriving in the United States to show proof of being fully vaccinated, the White House Covid-19 response coordinator Jeff Zients said. He said the new rules would take effect in early November, a timeline that will give agencies and airlines "time to prepare."
The lifting of blanket restrictions on travel to the United States from certain countries will come as welcome news to thousands of foreign nationals with families in the United States who have been kept apart for almost the entire pandemic.
The Financial Times
 was first to report the news.
In addition to requiring vaccination, the administration said it was taking other steps to mitigate spread of the virus in three other areas: testing, contact tracing and masking.
Fully vaccinated foreign nationals and American citizens returning to the United States from abroad will be required to take a pre-departure Covid-19 test within three days of their flight, and show proof of a negative result before boarding. They will also need to do a viral test, such as a PCR or rapid test, three to five days after arrival; the test must be authorized for use in the country where it's administered.
Unvaccinated Americans returning to the US will be "subject to stricter testing requirements," Zients said, including a test within one day of departure and an additional test when they return.
Fully vaccinated passengers will not be subject to any quarantine mandates upon arrival in the US.
The US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention plans to issue a contact tracing order requiring airlines to collect information from US-bound travelers, including a phone number and email address, to alert travelers of potential exposure. Airlines will be required to keep contact tracing information for 30 days.
"This will enable CDC and state and local public health officials to follow up with inbound travelers and those around them if someone has potentially been exposed to Covid-19 and other pathogens," Zients said, adding that this new requirement will be used more broadly going forward to help protect "against any future public health threats."
The new guidance applies to all international travel. "Fully vaccinated," as per the CDC, includes those who have received not only the vaccines approved for use in the US but those listed for emergency use by the World Health Organization but have not yet received such approval in the US, such as the AstraZeneca vaccine.
The development is a first step toward repairing one of the several emerging rifts between the Biden administration and officials in Europe. A spat has emerged between the United States and France over a deal to equip Australia with nuclear-powered submarines, depriving France of a contract to provide conventional subs. European leaders also found consultations with the Biden team over Afghanistan to be lacking.
It will also be greeted favorably by the travel industry, which had been lobbying the federal government to lift some of the rules preventing international tourism. Airlines, hotels and hospitality groups had all voiced support for allowing vaccinated tourists from abroad back into the United States.
Zients maintained that the administration is "not taking any measures off the table" when asked about the possibility of vaccine mandates for Americans traveling domestically. And he said there were no updates to existing rules on land border crossings with Canada and Mexico.
Welcome news to many
US travel bans were first imposed in the earliest days of the pandemic when then-President Donald Trump limited travel from China in January 2020. That step failed to prevent the virus from reaching the United States, but additional countries were added to the list as health officials pressed the White House to limit entry from places where case rates were high.
Trump added countries in the Schengen Zone -- which encompasses 26 states in Europe, including France, Germany and Italy -- along with Ireland and the United Kingdom. Brazil, South Africa and India were added separately. Land borders with Canada and Mexico were also closed.
Biden had maintained the strict bans on nonessential travel, even as vaccination rates in Europe ticked upward, citing the unpredictable nature of the pandemic and the emergence of the Delta variant.
But the system proved infuriating to European governments, whose countries' citizens were still barred entry to the United States even as those nations brought their case counts down amid successful vaccination campaigns. Countries with higher cases that were not on the list were not subject to the rules.
Months of discussion
Over the course of the past months, travel restrictions on people wishing to enter the United States had devolved into a major transatlantic rift. European leaders, frustrated at the apparent lack of progress, began taking their gripes public. They said the rules were damaging relations between Europe and the United States.
Europe opened its borders to Americans in June, but last month reversed course, removing the United States from a safe list of countries whose citizens are exempt from quarantine or testing requirements. Anger over a lack of reciprocation from the United States partly fueled the decision, European officials familiar with the matter said.
Biden entered office vowing to restore frayed alliances and spent much of a trip to Europe in June proclaiming his commitment to transatlantic ties. He announced during that visit a series of task forces meant to examine reopening travel, but months passed with little to show for the effort.
Overseen by the White House Covid-19 response team and the National Security Council, the groups include representatives from the CDC along with officials from the Departments of State, Health and Human Services, Homeland Security and Transportation.
The American officials were partnered with representatives from the European Union, United Kingdom, Canada and Mexico and have met several times to discuss the reopening situation since the administration announced them at the start of Biden's first foreign trip in June. There have also been multiple smaller group conversations in between those larger meetings to discuss specific issues, like the epidemiological situation, variants, surveillance, and vaccination efforts and plans for changing travel restrictions, a White House official told CNN.
But some people familiar with the working groups had questioned their effectiveness, as other countries began to open to Americans with little clarity over whether the US would reciprocate. One source familiar with the discussions described "paralysis among agencies" over next steps. 
This story has been updated with additional reporting as well as guidance from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
"This experience today of the rising energy prices is a clear wake up call... that we should accelerate the transition to clean energy, wean ourselves off the fossil fuel dependency," a senior EU official told reporters as the European Commission unveiled a series of measures aimed at tackling the crisis.  
The European Union is facing a sharp spike in 
energy prices
, driven by increased global demand as the world recovers from the pandemic and lower-than-expected natural gas deliveries from 
Russia
. Wholesale electricity prices have increased by 200% compared to the 2019 average, according to the European Commission.
"Winter is coming and for many electricity costs are larger than they have been for a decade," Energy Commissioner Kadri Simson told reporters on Wednesday.
Wholesale gas prices Through the Public Service Loan Forgiveness program, the government forgives remaining federal student loan debt for qualifying public-sector workers after they have made monthly payments for 10 years. 
But the program has long been criticized for being 
difficult to navigate
, with borrowers receiving 
little help
 from their loan servicers, the companies that handle billing and other services. Many borrowers have said they found out they weren't eligible for forgiveness only after making what they thought were a decade's worth of qualifying payments.
In an announcement Wednesday, the Education Department said it will "restore the promise" of the debt relief program through a series of actions that will be implemented "over the coming months," according to an agency memo.
These actions include offering a time-limited waiver authorizing "all prior payments" from student borrowers to count towards the program, including loan types and payment plans that didn't previously qualify for forgiveness. This waiver will continue through October 31, 2022, the memo said.
"This Limited PSLF Waiver will apply to borrowers with Direct Loans, those who have already consolidated into the Direct Loan Program, and those with other types of federal student loans who submit a consolidation application into the Direct Loan Program while the waiver is in effect," according to the agency's memo.
More than 1 million borrowers have made at least one qualifying payment, but only a small percentage of those enrolled have received forgiveness. Roughly 5,500 people have seen their debt wiped away, according to the latest government data.
Riddled with problems
This waiver is one part of an effort aimed at improving the public service loan program that has been riddled with problems in the years since it was signed into law by then-President George W. Bush in 2007. These issues include 
confusion about eligibility requirements 
and the correct types of federal student loans and repayment plans, as well as instances of miscommunication between the Education Department and the loan servicers, and between the servicers and borrowers.
"Borrowers who devote a decade of their lives to public service should be able to rely on the promise of Public Service Loan Forgiveness," said Education Secretary Miguel Cardona in a statement Wednesday. "The system has not delivered on that promise to date, but that is about to change for many borrowers who have served their communities and their country." 
Pointing to errors in the application review process as "particularly worrisome," the department also said it will be conducting both internal reviews of denied applications and external reviews of processing involved in the program.
"These actions will help identify and address servicing errors or other issues that have prevented borrowers from getting the PSLF credit they deserve," the agency said in a press release.
A commitment to military service members
Wednesday's announcement also includes a commitment to helping military service members and federal employees access the Public Service Loan Program's resources. 
"Next year, the Department will begin automatically giving federal employees credit for PSLF by matching Department of Education data with information held by other federal agencies about service members and the federal workforce," the agency stated. 
For military service members, time spent on active duty will be credited towards the program, even if loans were on deferment or forbearance. "Federal Student Aid will develop and implement a process to address periods of student loan deferments and forbearance for active-duty service members and will update affected borrowers to let them know what they need to do to take advantage of this change," according to the memo.
The Education Department also pledged to initiate an "extensive outreach campaign" to borrowers, streamline the application process and make longer-term improvements to the program through the rulemaking process going forward.
Political pressure
Pressure to simplify the Public Service Loan Forgiveness program has been growing under 
President Joe Biden
, who is making moves to streamline debt relief --  unlike his predecessor, who 
proposed ending Public Service Loan Forgiveness
 and 
stalled other debt cancellation benefits
.
More than 200 organizations
, including the nation's two largest teachers' unions, are calling on the administration to create a simpler path to cancel debt for anyone who has worked in the public sector for a decade or more. 
Some members of the Democratic Party, including Senate Majority Leader Chuck Schumer of New York and Sen. Elizabeth Warren of Massachusetts, 
have repeatedly called
 on the Biden administration to go further and cancel student debt of up to $50,000 for every borrower. 
But Biden has so far resisted those calls from within his party and instead has focused on making changes to existing programs, like one that provides debt relief for those 
defrauded by for-profit colleges
 and another that wipes away the loans of those who are 
permanently disabled. 
Biden has also 
extended the pandemic-related pause
 on federal student loan payments until January 31. Borrower balances have effectively been frozen for more than a year, with no payments required on federal loans since March 2020. The relief is even more significant for those seeking Public Service Loan Forgiveness. They are receiving credit toward the 10 years of required payments as if they had continued to make them during the pandemic, as long as they are still working full time for qualifying employers.
A source familiar with the former President's legal strategy confirms to CNN that an attorney for Trump sent letters to some of the subpoena targets, informing them of his plan to defend executive privilege. The letters were first reported by Politico.
"Executive privilege will be defended, not just on behalf of President Trump and his administration, but also on behalf of the Office of the President of the United States and the future of our nation," Taylor Budowich, director of communications for Save America and Trump, said in a statement.
RELATED: January 6 committee issues new subpoenas for 2 leaders of 'Stop the Steal' group
The letter, 
which was reviewed by the Washington Post
, was sent to former Trump adviser Dan Scavino, former Trump White House chief of staff Mark Meadows, former adviser Steve Bannon and Kash Patel, a former chief of staff to then-Acting Secretary of Defense Christopher Miller. 
While the letter instructed the subpoena targets to not comply with congressional investigators, according to the Post, it is up to each witness to decide whether to follow Trump's direction. 
Patel, in a statement to CNN on Thursday, would not confirm whether he had received a letter from Trump's attorney or how he plans to respond to the subpoena, but said: "I will continue to tell the American people the truth about January 6, and I am putting our country and freedoms first through my Fight with Kash initiative."
Rep. Pete Aguilar, a 
member of the select panel
, told CNN's Wolf Blitzer that it is not Trump's place to decide what information is covered by executive privilege.
"The former President, it is not his role to claim privilege. That is the current occupant in the White House," Aguilar said Thursday. "But, more broadly, this should not surprise anyone. The former President has done everything he can to try to get in the way of this investigation, including having Sen. (Mitch) McConnell go into his caucus and oppose the bipartisan commission that we all would've wanted," he said in reference to 
Senate Republicans' previous block
 of a bill that had sought to create an independent inquiry to investigate the deadly riot. 
The California Democrat added that the truth "is what we want, and clearly (Trump) has a problem with us getting to the truth, so that is why he is mounting a continued pressure campaign on these individuals who he is encouraging not cooperate."
Privilege games
So far, the question of how assertions of privilege will play out has resulted in a game of chicken. 
This summer, Trump and his legal team asked the Biden White House to assert privilege when former acting Attorney General Jeffrey Rosen and other senior former Justice Department officials provided testimony to the Senate Judiciary Committee about events before the January 6 attack. But Trump didn't seek to intervene when Biden waived privilege and the current Justice Department leaders cleared the way for the testimony of the former officials.  
Instead, Trump's attorney Doug Collins suggested to Fox News that Trump would take a different approach when it came to White House officials -- a strategy he may be using in the current round of subpoenas. Collins said in a letter this summer that the former President might claim privilege later, if the House pushed too far. 
Yet some attorneys representing witnesses in the January 6 inquiry say that by letting Rosen and others testify without a privilege battle, Trump's ground for shielding information has already receded. 
Another option is for Trump's allies to assert their Fifth Amendment right not to incriminate themselves. They could also, on their own, refuse to testify on Capitol Hill, going to court or 
daring the committee to use the Justice Department
 or judges to enforce the subpoena. 
When he left the administration, Trump identified several top advisers to work with the National Archives, which holds his presidential papers. Post-Watergate-era law allows for former Presidents to have some say over what they want to keep protected in their presidential records and also allows the Biden White House Counsel's Office to weigh in.
But the Archives have been slow process records and it's not yet clear what topics will be off limits and where the Biden White House and Trump will differ.
Previously, Trump blocked former officials from his White House from testifying on Capitol Hill by claiming they had an absolute immunity. The subpoenas were then derailed by court cases.
Trump hasn't been clear whether he'd try the same tactic again -- or whether assertions of privilege may come up question by question.
But without the power of the Justice Department or the White House behind him, it's uncertain how the privilege fight will now play out.
This story has been updated with additional information Thursday. 
Deeley, the chair of Philadelphia's three-member election commission and a Democrat, watched from home as Trump falsely claimed during the first 2020 presidential debate that poll watchers had already been turned away at early voting centers in Philadelphia.
"Bad things happen in Philadelphia," Trump said. 
Deeley's cell phone immediately lit up with calls and text messages.
"A lot of my family, my friends, got a little chuckle out of it, but I knew it wasn't at all something to laugh about," she told CNN. "It was just the beginning."
Trump's efforts to subvert the election began well before Election Day, and have only gained momentum since, with Republicans passing laws to restrict voting or make it easier for partisans to interfere in more than a dozen states, including key battlegrounds. Most recently, in Texas, Gov. Greg Abbott signed an election bill into law last week over the fierce objection of the state's Democrats, who, in hopes of derailing similar restrictions proposed earlier this summer, had fled the state two times en masse.
The state legislative efforts are bolstered by a coordinated, behind-the-scenes push by conservative groups to raise millions to support restrictive voting laws, spread unproven claims about voter fraud and fund sham audits of election results. All of which, election experts say, will make it easier the next time to overturn close results, and puts the future of free and fair elections in jeopardy.
"I don't think we've ever been at a point that's been quite this tenuous for the democracy," Christine Todd Whitman, a former GOP governor of New Jersey and a founder and co-chair of States United Democracy Center, told CNN. "I think it's a huge danger because it's the first time that I've seen it being undermined -- our democracy being undermined from within." 
CNN spoke to about a dozen state and county officials involved in elections for this story; all of them expressed concern that the widespread and unsubstantiated claims of a stolen election could take a lasting toll on American democracy. 
For weeks after the election, Trump tried to sabotage the will of American voters in his relentless attempts to overturn the results. He and his allies browbeat local officials in multiple states and tried in vain to coerce the Department of Justice to open a bogus investigation. They dispatched attorneys to file nearly 
60 lawsuits
 across the country; all but one minor case were dropped or dismissed -- some by Trump-appointed judges.
But while those efforts were stymied by a thin line of civil servants, a concerted push in myriad states to set the stage for a future power grab is finding more success. 
"It's all designed to make it easier to raise the doubt and uncertainty to allow a close election to be overturned," said Ben Berwick, an attorney at Protect Democracy, a nonpartisan organization that works to keep elections and election administration from being politicized.  "2020 was a preview of what is likely to be darker times to come, if we continue down this path away from democracy." 
Big lie fuels threats against election workers
Polls show most Republican voters continue to believe Trump's lie that he won the election. In July, 
a poll
 from The Associated Press and the NORC Center for Public Affairs Research found that two-thirds of Republicans still believe Biden was not legitimately elected.
That big lie, coupled with punishing new laws and threats against poll workers, has prompted fatigue in the field and 
a potential exodus
 of knowledgeable people to run smooth elections in the future, experts and poll workers say.
"What it's going to cause -- and we've seen this happening across the country -- is local officials are going to leave," said Matthew Masterson, a former senior cybersecurity adviser with the Department of Homeland Security's Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency, primarily responsible for elections. "That opens the door to adding more political actors -- less professional, more political actors -- into the election space, which, again, is incredibly dangerous." 
Nearly 1 in 3 election officials say they feel unsafe because of their jobs, and about 1 in 5 listed threats to their lives as a job-related concern, according to a spring 
survey
 commissioned by the Brennan Center for Justice at New York University's Law School. 
Among them is Claire Woodall-Vogg, the executive director of the Milwaukee election commission. In early August -- nine months after the election -- she received voicemails calling for her hanging. Those and other threats followed two rightwing websites publishing an email exchange in which she responded to a joke by an election consultant on November 4 about how the votes had been submitted at 3 a.m. The sites suggested Woodall-Vogg delivered Joe Biden a questionable win in her district.
"Are we going to hold people who are publishing conspiracy theories accountable when someone does get killed?" Woodall-Vogg said in an interview with CNN.  
In Philadelphia, Deeley was confronted outside the convention center a few days after the election by a man taking a cellphone 
video
 of her walking down the street. It was James Fitzpatrick, Trump's Pennsylvania director of Election Day operations, who lobbed allegations of corruption at her as she covered her face.
"It got millions of views," Deeley, an elected official, told CNN. "And awful comments about my physical shape, people called me all kinds of names, people saying I should be hung for treason, that 'we should find out where she lives and kill her,' 'we should bludgeon her.' I mean -- unbelievable." 
The city was also flooded with threatening phone calls. 
"People just wanted to believe," Deeley said. "They want to believe something that is not true. And there's not one shred of evidence to prove that it's true, but they just want to believe it."
It isn't just election officials who have faced threats. In Arizona, which in last year's presidential vote flipped from red to blue, a wave of animus came down on the majority-Republican Maricopa County Board of Supervisors, which oversees elections for about 60% of the state's voters. 
"On a daily basis ... we're told that we need to go in, go to jail -- either on social media, phone calls to the office, emails -- and the threats do continue," said Bill Gates, a Republican member of the board, adding that last month, "My colleagues and I all were treated to an orange jumpsuit that a gentleman sent to us and, you know, declared that we will end up in jail someday because we are traitors in the minds of these people."
Pressure campaign results in coup attempt
Just as he did in 
2016
, when he claimed the upcoming election was "rigged" against him, Trump started calling the integrity of the 2020 election into question long before any vote was cast. 
"The only way we're going to lose this election is if the election is rigged," he told a group of supporters in Wisconsin last August.
After the election, as the days ticked by, Trump's increasingly desperate behavior produced a steady barrage of headlines -- as it always has. From his perch at the White House, a symbol of the strongest democracy in human history, he made personal phone calls to local officials, badgering them to change the results. 
He paid considerable attention to Georgia, another state that flipped from red to blue in November.
In a particularly stunning exchange, Trump tried to convince Georgia Secretary of State Brad Raffensperger to change the vote count -- a move that became part of a criminal state investigation into attempts to "influence the election."
During that call, Trump said he wanted to "find 11,780 votes" -- the amount he needed to win Georgia by a single vote.
Trump's personal attorney, Rudy Giuliani, also made the rounds. He phoned Gates, the Republican member of the Maricopa County Board of Supervisors in Arizona. 
Gates did not return the call. 
"This was the first time that I was ever aware of that you had folks at the national level trying to impose their will on a county elected official," Gates told CNN. "That was bizarre and frightening."
Trump also convened multiple meetings with elected officials from purple states at the White House to discuss election fraud, even though his own Department of Homeland Security declared the election "the most secure in American history." 
And on January 6 in Washington -- the day Vice President Mike Pence disregarded Trump's request to challenge the results -- Trump told tens of thousands of supporters who'd convened in DC that day to "fight like hell." A deadly riot ensued shortly after at the US Capitol. 
But it wasn't until this summer, when a series of revelations surfaced about how Trump had sought to use his Department of Justice as a cudgel to turn a loss into a win, that it became clear what the totality of his actions amounted to: 
an attempted coup
. 
In late July, the Department of Justice 
released documents 
showing that Trump in December had threatened to replace his acting attorney general, Jeffrey Rosen, with a midlevel attorney in the Justice Department named Jeffrey Clark, who'd been meeting with Trump and promoted
 wild conspiracy theories
 about election fraud -- such as that a Dominion voting machine had "accessed the Internet through a smart thermostat with a net connection trail leading back to China." Clark also urged his superiors -- Rosen and his deputy, Richard Donoghue --  to sign a letter to Georgia's governor falsely claiming the Department of Justice had "identified significant concerns that may have impacted the outcome of the election in multiple States, including the State of Georgia."
None of that worked to keep Trump in office. But the extraordinary events of the past year raise the question: Was the chaotic campaign to circumvent the will of American voters unique to Trump? Or has a new standard been set? 
"Trump-ism is going to survive Donald Trump, and he has unleashed a set of forces, anti-democratic -- small-D democratic -- anti-democratic forces that are going to plague American democracy for years to come," warned Rick Hasen, an election law expert at the University of California at Irvine. "I think we're in grave danger."
New laws shift election powers
Five days before the November election, Georgia Gov. Brian Kemp's office 
announced
 that he and his wife were in quarantine after having been in contact with someone who'd tested positive for Covid-19. That day, Kemp requested an absentee ballot, which 
arrived
 a day before the election.
Four months later, in March, Kemp signed a voting bill into law that, had it been in place for the 2020 election, would have barred even himself from receiving a ballot, said Tonnie Adams, a self-described conservative who serves as elections supervisor for Georgia's Heard County. 
"I'm not kidding," Adams told CNN. "Gov. Kemp would not have been able to vote if this rule had been in place."
Under Georgia's Election Integrity Act of 2021, voters are not permitted to apply for an absentee ballot within 
11 days
 before the election -- which would have invalidated Kemp. In addition to making absentee voting -- or "mail-in voting" -- harder in this and other ways, the new law reduces drop boxes, essentially bans mobile voting centers, makes it illegal for election officials to mail out unsolicited absentee-ballot applications to all voters, and also makes it illegal for people to offer food or water to voters in line within a certain radius of the voting precinct.
Georgia's law is just one of a slew to be proposed or enacted in the noisy aftermath of the election, all hurriedly conceived at a time of rampant amplification of Trump's lie. The Justice Department is 
suing the state
 over its new voting restrictions.
In more than a dozen states -- including toss-ups like Georgia, Arizona and Florida -- Republican-led legislatures are enacting laws that could make it more difficult to vote. The restrictions are expected to 
disproportionately impact
 a rapidly growing demographic -- non-White voters --  to the benefit of a 
shrinking Republican base
.
 
Voter-outreach groups say the batch of new statutes represents the most serious threat to the voting power of the marginalized since Jim Crow-era poll taxes and literacy tests, which sought to curtail the Black vote and were banished by the 24th Amendment and federal Voting Rights Act of 1965. 
Aklima Khondoker, chief legal officer of the New Georgia Project -- a nonpartisan voter registration group founded by Stacey Abrams -- said the surge of new laws is "shocking, but not surprising." 
"I was shocked because it is appalling to see this out-and-out lie proliferate the way that it has over our elections," she said. "It's not surprising, because when you look at the history of voting -- not only in Georgia but across our nation -- it has always been fraught. It has always come up against challenges to people of color specifically." 
Georgia's new law, experts say, is the boldest of the bunch.
"It's a massive power grab," said Adams.
To be sure, there are some provisions of the 98-page Georgia law that actually 
expand voting access
, such as weekend hours during the early voting period. 
But Georgia's law and others passed in 2021 are calling for a new kind of tactic that experts find alarming, in which elections are increasingly overseen by partisan officials. Hasen, the elections expert at UC Irvine, calls it "election subversion," a phenomenon that he says is distinct from "voter suppression" and is "newly appearing on the horizon." 
"The idea here is manipulating how votes are counted or how elections are conducted, so that it's possible that the winner who was announced is not actually the choice of the voters," Hasen said.
Georgia's law takes what had been the secretary of state's seat on the state elections board and hands it to a legislative appointee, granting the GOP-controlled legislature more power over the board. It then allows that board to suspend county election officials and replace them with an 
individual
 of its choosing. The law effectively empowers partisan state lawmakers to intervene in how counties administer and count the vote -- a process that has 
already begun
 in Fulton County, the state's most populous, predominantly blue county that's faced complaints over its election operations for years.
In Arizona, a new law includes a remarkable end run around Democrats.  
In recent months, Gov. Doug Ducey signed into law GOP measures that, along with enacting voting restrictions and making it easier to purge early voting lists, stripped power from the secretary of state, Democrat Katie Hobbs. It shifts control over any election-related litigation to Arizona's attorney general, currently Republican Mark Brnovich, but only until January 2023, when Hobbs' term ends -- in effect, ensuring that a Republican official will control any litigation over mid-term elections in that state.
"That's pretty blatant," said Lawrence"Mr. Bannon has declined to cooperate with the Select Committee and is instead hiding behind the former President's insufficient, blanket, and vague statements regarding privileges he has purported to invoke," Democratic Rep. Bennie Thompson, who chairs the committee, said in a statement on Thursday.
LIVE UPDATES: January 6 committee pursues criminal contempt referral for Bannon
Bannon was scheduled for a deposition in front of the committee on Thursday, and Bannon's lawyer wrote in a letter the day before to the panel saying that his client will not provide testimony or documents until the committee reaches an agreement with former President Donald Trump over executive privilege or a court weighs in on the matter.
"We reject his position entirely," Thompson continued in his statement. "The Select Committee will not tolerate defiance of our subpoenas, so we must move forward with proceedings to refer Mr. Bannon for criminal contempt."
With the committee officially announcing its decision to move forward with criminal contempt for Bannon, the next step is for the committee to hold a business meeting, which Thompson said would be Tuesday.
What happens next
The business meeting next week is the first in a series of steps needed to move forward with criminal contempt. In this meeting, the committee will adopt a contempt report, which outlines the efforts the committee made to get a witness to comply with the subpoena, and the failure by the witness to do so.
This report is then referred to the House for a vote. If the vote succeeds, House Speaker Nancy Pelosi certifies the report to the United States attorney for the District of Columbia. Under law, this certification then requires the United States attorney to "bring the matter before the grand jury for its action," but the Justice Department will also makes its own determinations for prosecuting. 
Any individual who is found liable for contempt of Congress is then guilty of a crime that may result in a fine and between one and 12 months imprisonment. But this process is rarely invoked, and rarely leads to jail time.
As severe as a criminal contempt referral sounds, the House's choice to use the Justice Department may be more of a warning shot than a solution. Holding Bannon in criminal contempt through a prosecution could take years, and historic criminal contempt cases have been derailed by appeals and acquittals.
Other subpoenas
Three other Trump allies also face subpoena deadlines this week. Two of them, Trump's former chief of staff Mark Meadows and former administration official Kash Patel, have been "engaging" with the committee, according to the panel, though it remains unclear if that contact amounts to any form of cooperation. The select committee agreed to short postponements of Patel's and Meadows' appearances as they continue to engage with the investigation, a committee aide told CNN on Thursday.
But while Patel and Meadows appear to have bought themselves more time, the committee made clear Thursday its patience is limited. Rep. Adam Schiff echoed that sentiment in an interview Thursday, providing a rare window into how the committee is approaching talks with these individuals.
The California Democrat described Patel to MSNBC as "demonstration of the principle in the Trump administration that the more willing you were to do anything the President wanted, no matter how unscrupulous, the higher and faster you could rise." 
"And he rose Phoenix-like through the Trump administration one position after another, even being contemplated to take over the CIA," Schiff said, adding that Patel was "an evil Zelig."
The committee was able only recently to serve Trump's former deputy chief of staff Dan Scavino a subpoena, a source familiar with the matter told CNN, and his deadline to appear for a deposition has likely been delayed.
Asked Thursday about the possibility of subpoenaing Trump, Thompson told CNN's Wolf Blitzer on "
The Situation Room
" that "nobody is off limits to a subpoena from this committee."
Thompson went on to dismiss the former President's attacks on the House panel as "cute."
"Everybody that I know saw what happened on January 6. So clearly that's not who we are as Americans. If former President Trump thinks he can get away with what happened on January 6 by being cute with his press releases, then he has another thing coming," he said. 
Republican Rep. Adam Kinzinger of Illinois, one of two GOP members serving on the select panel, offered a similar warning later Thursday evening. "Anybody that is either being subpoenaed now or will be in the future, think twice before you reject a lawful order from Congress," he told CNN's Anderson Cooper on "AC360."
Focusing on Bannon 
CNN reported Wednesday
 that the committee is unified in its plan to seek criminal charges against those who refuse to comply, and lawmakers have specifically honed in on Bannon while discussing the option publicly.
"The reason why some of these witnesses, people like Steve Bannon, who have been public about their contempt for Congress feel they can get away with it is for four years, they did," Schiff told MSNBC on Wednesday.
Schiff, who also chairs the Intelligence Committee, noted that Bannon had 
refused to cooperate with the House's Russia investigation 
during the Trump administration because he "would never be held in contempt."
"He would never be prosecuted by the Trump Justice Department. But those days are over. And I view that not only as essential to our investigation but I also view this, the enforcement of the rule of law, as an early test of whether our democracy is recovering," the California Democrat added.    
The letter from Bannon's legal team said it may be up to the courts to decide whether he is ultimately forced to cooperate -- essentially daring the House to sue or hold him in criminal contempt.
"As such, until these issues are resolved, we are unable to respond to your request for documents and testimony," wrote the lawyer, Robert Costello.
The claim that Bannon could be covered by the former President's privilege is unusual, because Bannon was not working for the federal government during the period surrounding the January 6 insurrection.
CNN legal analyst Norm Eisen swiftly pushed back on Costello's letter Wednesday, saying, "It's just wrong. The letter quotes a case saying 'the President' can make executive privilege determinations. But Trump is no longer 'the President.' In the United States, we only have one of those at a time, he is Joe Biden, and he has not asserted privilege here."
Privilege claims normally apply to close officials around the President and deliberations between government employees, and Bannon was fired from his role as a White House adviser in 2017.
Many legal experts agree with the committee that Bannon, as a private citizen, would have no standing to block a subpoena by claiming executive privilege.
Historic criminal contempt cases 
As severe as a criminal contempt referral sounds, the House's choice to use the Justice Department may be more of a warning shot than a solution. Holding Bannon in criminal contempt through a prosecution could take years, and historic criminal contempt cases have been derailed by appeals and acquittals. 
"They're in a box, in a way," Stanley Brand, a former House general counsel, said on Wednesday. "Any way they go is a legal donnybrook, potentially that will take time."
Congress almost never forces a recalcitrant witness into testifying 
through prosecution, 
according to several longtime Washington attorneys familiar with congressional proceedings.
An Environmental Protection Agency official in the Reagan administration was the last person indicted for criminal contempt of Congress. The DC US Attorney's Office of the Justice Department took eight days from receiving the House's contempt referral for Rita Lavelle in 1983 
to having a grand jury indict her
. Lavelle fought the charges to trial, and a 
jury found her not guilty
. 
At least one other criminal contempt proceeding predating Lavelle, during the anti-communist McCarthy-era investigations of the 1950s,
 was overturned
 by the Supreme Court on appeal. In more recent administrations, the Justice Department 
has declined to prosecute contempt referrals 
-- though in those situations, Congress has made contempt referrals on members of the sitting president's administration.
"I'm watching people on TV bloviate about this. They're going to send [Bannon] to criminal contempt. OK. Fine. That just starts the case," Brand, who was the House general counsel during Lavelle's contempt proceedings, told CNN. "There's a trial. It's not automatic they're going to get convicted." 
The criminal contempt approach also is structured to be more of a punishment than an attempt to compel a witness to speak.
"It's not like civil contempt, where you hold the keys to your jail cell and get released" if a witness agrees to testify, Brand said. 
Instead, the House essentially loses control of the case as the Justice Department takes over to prosecute.
"They don't have any time," Brand added. "They've got to get this done before next year, before there's an election."
This story and headline have been updated with additional developments Thursday.
"He was admitted to the ICU for close monitoring and administered IV antibiotics and fluids. He remains at the hospital for continuous monitoring," according to a joint statement Thursday evening from Dr. Alpesh Amin, chair of medicine at UC Irvine Medical Center, and Dr. Lisa Bardack, Clinton's personal primary physician. They said that Clinton was in the ICU for privacy and safety, not because he needs intensive care.
Clinton is in good spirits, talking to family and staff, and has been up and walking, according to both his doctors and his staff. The 42nd President is annoyed that he has to be in the hospital but is chatting and joking, a spokesperson, Angel UreA state-of-the-science report published by the UN in August showed that the world is warming faster than scientists previously thought, and that 
slashing greenhouse gas emissions
 by at least half this decade is crucial to staving off the more catastrophic impacts of the climate crisis. 
This past year of deadly wildfires and floods in many parts of the world has left little doubt that climate change is here now, and is touching all corners of the Earth. UN Secretary General Ant"I feel that I'm a partner on this journey of healing, bringing together, unity," Biden said during a brief Q&A with the press, adding that it's not just about America. "It's global, right? It's a global thing."
Biden on Saturday ventured to Newlyn Art Gallery in Newlyn, England, a Victorian-era building, and sat down at a shady outdoor picnic table to discuss veterans' issues with a group of surfers. If that sounds incongruous, it is not. 
The 
Bude Surf Veterans
 is a program of volunteers who help first responders, veterans and military families cope with the stress of their jobs and lives by taking them on surfing excursions in the waters off the coast of Cornwall. Biden told the Bude Surf participants and their families that she herself is a surfer, with her own longboard -- "It is white, with a big butterfly on it" -- and that she was a champion of helping veterans in creative and therapeutic ways, whether with physical activities or emotional support.
"The water is so calming," Biden told the group, which included members wearing Bude Surf shirts with the words, "Surf. Grow. Heal." on them.
Biden selected the Bude Surf group as a good place for a solo spotlight due, in part, to its support from the Invictus Games Foundation, the wounded warriors' athletic competition founded by Biden's good friend, Prince Harry, the Duke of Sussex. Biden and the Prince have been close acquaintances since they met in Washington, DC, at an event in 2012, when the first lady was second lady. Since then, she -- and at times, her husband -- have attended several Invictus Games events, drawing attention to the charitable project born in the United Kingdom.
"They're all dealing with PTSD or anxiety, a lot of mental health issues," Biden said of the surf club participants. "But once they found surfing, they reached out to other veterans who ... need healing and help with their mental health. It's just a way to build back their confidence and to help them deal with life and get on the right track again."
For Biden, putting mental health and veterans' well-being atop her list of initiatives is personal. 
"When my son Beau came back from Iraq, I said to him, 'Beau, I'm going to be working with veterans. What should I know? What's important?'" Biden said Saturday, referencing her late son, Beau Biden, who died of a brain tumor in 2015. "He said, 'Mom, you have to focus on mental health.'"
She founded Joining Forces with former first lady Michelle Obama a decade ago to help military families and veterans, and has resurrected it now for her own turn as first lady.
Saturday marked one of several events Biden put on her calendar for England that include military issues -- events that go beyond service and combat. On Sunday, following a meeting with Queen Elizabeth at Windsor Castle, Biden will meet with British veterans who participated in Walk of America, a 2018 expedition for which Biden served as patron. Led by the group Walking for the Wounded, three veterans from the United States and three from the United Kingdom walked 1,000 miles across America, sharing stories of fellow service members wounded or injured during their time in the military.
For Biden, the extra events and the solo time to use her platform as first lady to talk about emotional health is outlining the "healer" part of how she sees her job, in the post-pandemic era and perhaps beyond. 
"You know, everybody's had a tough year," Biden said, talking about the United States and the global community assembled at the G7 Summit. "But now we're together, and we're kind of saying, 'Hey, how do we go forward? And how do we give people hope getting there?'"
https://www.cnn.com/2021/06/12/politics/jill-biden-first-lady-g7-veterans/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/04/29/politics/jill-biden-first-100-days/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2019/01/28/us/kamala-harris-fast-facts/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/24/politics/senate-race-rankings-september/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/10/14/politics/gallup-poll-big-government-biden/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/20/politics/biden-administration-international-travel-restrictions/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/10/14/politics/steve-bannon-deposition-deadline/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2013/02/01/us/bill-clinton-fast-facts/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/10/14/politics/bill-clinton-hospitalized/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/23/world/what-is-cop26-glasgow-un-climate-conference-cmd-intl/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2018/05/02/politics/grassroots-groups-endorsements-democratic-primaries/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/24/politics/senate-race-rankings-september/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/01/politics/afghanistan-blame-game/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/03/24/politics/kamala-harris-immigration-central-america/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/22/politics/haitian-immigrants-us-border-explained/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/10/07/politics/fda-commissioner-vacancy/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/03/30/health/fda-commissioner-biden/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/02/08/politics/us-reengagement-un-human-rights-council/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/25/health/covid-boosters-5-things/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/09/politics/joe-biden-covid-speech/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/10/08/politics/white-house-privilege-january-6-committee/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/05/investing/stocks-week-ahead/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/07/26/investing/what-is-cryptocurrency-explained/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/08/25/politics/january-6-house-documents-investigation/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/07/28/politics/armed-insurrection-january-6-guns-fact-check/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/14/politics/department-of-homeland-security-memo-january-6/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/10/13/politics/supreme-court-commission-white-house/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/01/30/politics/supreme-court-biden-commission/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/29/politics/sonia-sotomayor/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/23/politics/roe-v-wade-history/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/28/politics/americans-evacuated-afghanistan-tuesday/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/01/06/politics/ossoff-perdue-georgia-election-news/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/07/politics/donald-trump-2024/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/10/04/politics/democrats-house-senate-2022/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/05/21/politics/georgia-ballot-audit-fulton-county/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/27/politics/arizona-trump-election-lies/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/10/business/biden-vaccine-mandate/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/04/03/us/florida-covid-vaccine-passport-ban/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/20/politics/trump-pence-election-memo/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/10/12/business/global-supply-chain-nightmare/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/10/13/business/energy-crisis-europe/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/10/06/politics/public-service-loan-forgiveness-program-overhaul/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/10/07/politics/trump-executive-privilege-house-subpoena/index.html
https://www.cnn.com/2021/09/12/politics/trump-2020-future-presidential-elections-invs/index.html
